
So it's worth taking a guess at what exactly has been going on in Trump's head:


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/31/us/politics/donald-trump-russia-hacking.html
	Trump Promises a Revelation on Hacking

	By MAGGIE HABERMAN
	DEC. 31, 2016

	President-elect Donald J. Trump, expressing lingering skepticism about intelligence assessments of Russian interference in the election, said on Saturday evening that he knew “things that other people don’t know” about the hacking, and that the information would be revealed “on Tuesday or Wednesday.”

	Speaking to a handful of reporters outside his Palm Beach, Fla., club, Mar-a-Lago, Mr. Trump cast his declarations of doubt as an effort to seek the truth.

	“I just want them to be sure because it’s a pretty serious charge,” Mr. Trump said of the intelligence agencies. “If you look at the weapons of mass destruction, that was a disaster, and they were wrong,” he added, referring to intelligence cited by the George W. Bush administration to support its march to war in 2003. “So I want them to be sure,” the president-elect said. “I think it’s unfair if they don’t know.”

	He added: “And I know a lot about hacking. And hacking is a very hard thing to prove. So it could be somebody else. And I also know things that other people don’t know, and so they cannot be sure of the situation.”

	When asked what he knew that others did not, Mr. Trump demurred, saying only, “You’ll find out on Tuesday or Wednesday.”

	Mr. Trump, who does not use email, also advised people to avoid computers when dealing with delicate material. “It’s very important, if you have something really important, write it out and have it delivered by courier, the old-fashioned way, because I’ll tell you what, no computer is safe,” Mr. Trump said.

	“I don’t care what they say, no computer is safe,” he added. “I have a boy who’s 10 years old; he can do anything with a computer. You want something to really go without detection, write it out and have it sent by courier.”

	The comments on Saturday were a departure from a statement that Mr. Trump issued through transition officials last week, in which he said that it was time for people to “move on” from the hacking issue but that he would be briefed on the matter by intelligence officials early in the new year.

	...Mr. Trump, who has sought a warmer relationship with Mr. Putin, has repeatedly scoffed at the notion that Russia was behind the hacking, a stance at odds with members of his own party. At one point, Mr. Trump declared that the hacking may have been the work of “someone sitting on their bed weighing 400 pounds.”


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/816452807024840704?lang=en
	The "Intelligence" briefing on so-called "Russian hacking" was delayed until Friday, perhaps more time needed to build a case. Very strange!
	5:14 PM - 3 Jan 2017 


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/312609-trumps-delayed-meeting-was-always-scheduled-for-friday-report
	Report: Trump's 'delayed' intelligence meeting was always scheduled for Friday
	01/03/17


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/schumer-warns-trump-intel-officials-have-six-ways-from-sunday-at-getting-back-at-you/article/2610823
	Schumer warns Trump: Intel officials 'have six ways from Sunday at getting back at you'
	by Daniel Chaitin
	Jan 3, 2016

	The new leader of Democrats in the Senate says Donald Trump is being "really dumb" for picking a fight with intelligence officials, suggesting they have ways to strike back, after the president-elect speculated Tuesday that his "so-called" briefing about Russian cyberattacks had been delayed in order to build a case.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/investigation-of-russian-hacking-is-a-witch-hunt-trump-says/2017/01/06/cf330600-d430-11e6-a783-cd3fa950f2fd_story.html
 	Investigation of Russian hacking is a ‘witch hunt,’ Trump says 

	By David Nakamura January 6

	As U.S. intelligence officials have raised increasing alarm this week over Russia’s meddling in the presidential election, Donald Trump has sought to recast the investigation as a matter of old-fashioned politics rather than national security.

	The president-elect has reacted to mounting pressure to take stronger steps against Russia not only by trying to discredit the intelligence community but also by suggesting that the intense Washington focus on the issue is being driven by political rivals still stung by his electoral victory.

	“This is a political witch hunt,” Trump said Friday in an interview with the New York Times ahead of a private briefing from U.S. officials on a classified 50-page report, ordered by President Obama, on Russia’s role in the election.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	Statement for the Record

	Senate Select Committee on Intelligence

	James B. Comey

	...January 6 Briefing

	I first met then- President-Elect Trump on Friday, January 6

	...I remained alone with the President-Elect to brief him on some personally sensitive aspects of the information assembled during the assessment.

	The IC leadership thought it important, for a variety of reasons, to alert the incoming President to the existence of this material, even though it was salacious and unverified.

	...When the FBI develops reason to believe an American has been targeted for recruitment by a foreign power or is covertly acting as an agent of the foreign power, the FBI will “open an investigation” on that American and use legal authorities to try to learn more about the nature of any relationship with the foreign power so it can be disrupted.

	In that context, prior to the January 6 meeting, I discussed with the FBI’s leadership team whether I should be prepared to assure President-Elect Trump that we were not investigating him personally. That was true; we did not have an open counter-intelligence case on him. We agreed I should do so if circumstances warranted. During our one-on-one meeting at Trump Tower, based on President-Elect Trump’s reaction to the briefing and without him directly asking the question, I offered that assurance.


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/jan/06/donald-trump-russia-hacking-meeting-intelligence-officials
	Spencer Ackerman in New York and Julian Borger and David Smith in Washington

	Friday 6 January 2017 13.49 EST 

	Donald Trump struck a conciliatory tone with US intelligence officials after meeting with their leadership, but did not publicly support their conclusion that Russia interfered in the 2016 US presidential contest.

	In a statement issued ahead of the release of a declassified version of the intelligence assessment, Trump said he had “tremendous respect for the work and service done by the men and women of this community”, describing his meeting with James Clapper, the director of national intelligence, and other senior intelligence officials, as “constructive”.

	His comments came after an extraordinary public feud between Trump and leaders of the intelligence apparatus he will soon control. However, Trump discussed the hack and leak of embarrassing Democratic National Committee data in generic terms, suggesting he had not moved away from his earlier statements casting attribution for the data breach as unknowable.

	“Russia, China, other countries, outside groups and people are consistently trying to break through the cyber infrastructure of our governmental institutions, businesses and organizations,” Trump said in a Friday afternoon statement, and underlined “there was absolutely no effect on the outcome of the election including the fact that there was no tampering whatsoever with voting machines”.

	...Trump and his deputies have treated discussion of potential foreign interference in a US election as an effort merely to delegitimize his presidency before it begins. 


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/trump-team-russia-cia-intel-election-232460
	Trump team rejects intel agencies' claims of Russian meddling
	12/09/2016

	Donald Trump is rejecting official assessments that Russia interfered with the U.S. election — reportedly to help him win the presidency — by comparing intelligence agencies' latest analyses to the past flawed claims that led to the Iraq war.

	"These are the same people that said Saddam Hussein had weapons of mass destruction," the Trump transition team said in a statement late Friday. 


https://web.archive.org/web/20170110221529/http://www.cnn.com/2017/01/10/politics/donald-trump-intelligence-report-russia/index.html
	Intel chiefs presented Trump with claims of Russian efforts to compromise him

	By Evan Perez, Jim Sciutto and Jake Tapper and Carl Bernstein, CNN

	Updated 5:09 PM ET, Tue January 10, 2017

	Classified documents presented last week to President Obama and President-elect Trump included allegations that Russian operatives claim to have compromising personal and financial information about Mr. Trump, multiple US officials with direct knowledge of the briefings tell CNN.

	The allegations were presented in a two-page synopsis that was appended to a report on Russian interference in the 2016 election. The allegations came, in part, from memos compiled by a former British intelligence operative, whose past work US intelligence officials consider credible.

	...One reason the nation's intelligence chiefs took the extraordinary step of including the synopsis in the briefing documents was to make the President-elect aware that such allegations involving him are circulating among intelligence agencies, senior members of Congress and other government officials in Washington, multiple sources tell CNN.

	...One high level administration official told CNN, "I have a sense the outgoing administration and intelligence community is setting down the pieces so this must be investigated seriously and run down. I think [the] concern was to be sure that whatever information was out there is put into the system so it is evaluated as it should be and acted upon as necessary."


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/donald-trump-sex-allegations-russia-hacking-intelligence-report-perverted-moscow-a7520916.html
	Donald Trump Russia claims: Leaked documents allege Moscow holds compromising dossier on President-elect

	The President-elect has dismissed the allegations as 'fake news'

	Wednesday 11 January 2017


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/819164172781060096
	Intelligence agencies should never have allowed this fake news to "leak" into the public. One last shot at me.Are we living in Nazi Germany?
	4:48 AM - 11 Jan 2017


http://abcnews.go.com/US/trump-odds-intel-chief-characterization-conversation-russia-report/story?id=44723926
	Trump at Odds With Intel Chief on Characterization of Conversation About Russia Report

	...Trump railed against the intelligence community in a tweet earlier Wednesday, suggesting that the IC "allowed" the document to leak.

	...Trump conceded today that Russia was probably responsible for the hacking after casting doubt on the IC's assessment.


http://time.com/4632743/james-clapper-donald-trump-russia/
	U.S. Intelligence Chief James Clapper to Donald Trump: We Didn't Leak Russia Documents


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/11/us/politics/trump-press-conference-transcript.html
	JAN. 11, 2017

	QUESTION: But why did you spend weeks undermining U.S. intelligence community before simply getting the facts and then making a public statement?

	TRUMP: Well, I think it’s pretty sad when intelligence reports get leaked out to the press. I think it’s pretty sad. First of all, it’s illegal. You know, these are — these are classified and certified meetings and reports.

	I’ll tell you what does happen. I have many meetings with intelligence. And every time I meet, people are reading about it. Somebody’s leaking it out. So, there’s — maybe it’s my office. Maybe in my office because I have a lot of people, a lot of great people. Maybe it’s them. And what I did is I said I won’t tell anybody. I’m going to have a meeting and I won’t tell anybody about my meeting with intelligence.

	And what happened is I had my meeting. Nobody knew, not even Rhona, my executive assistant for years, she didn’t know — I didn’t tell her. Nobody knew. The meeting was had, the meeting was over, they left. And immediately the word got out that I had a meeting.

	So, I don’t want that — I don’t want that. It’s very unfair to the country. It’s very unfair to our country; what’s happened. That report should have never — first of all, it shouldn’t have been printed because it’s not worth the paper it’s written on. And I thank the New York Times for saying that.

	I thank a lot of different people for saying that. But, I will tell you, that should never, ever happen. OK.


Apparently, Trump honestly think the USIC is out to get him and suspects they leaked the "dirty dossier." Trump reacts strongly to the allegations in the dossier.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/819520238446411777
	James Clapper called me yesterday to denounce the false and fictitious report that was illegally circulated. Made up, phony facts.Too bad!
	4:23 AM - 12 Jan 2017 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/blogs/post-partisan/wp/2017/01/13/comey-should-resign/?utm_term=.8f73c665d86b
	Comey should resign
	By Ed Rogers January 13

	The Wall Street Journal says President-elect Donald Trump's incoming administration should fire James Comey if the FBI director does not resign.


http://thehill.com/policy/national-security/fbi/314144-wall-street-journal-fbi-head-should-resign
	Wall Street Journal: Comey should resign
	By Mark Hensch - 01/13/17 10:04 AM EST 


http://www.msnbc.com/am-joy/watch/james-comey-should-he-resign-855064131798
	AM Joy 1/14/17
	James Comey: Should he resign?

	Joy Reid and her guests discuss the growing calls for FBI Director James Comey to resign following accusations that he acted perhaps unwisely and possibly with bias related to actions that may have impacted the election.


http://time.com/4635505/bernie-sanders-james-comey-fbi/
	Bernie Sanders: FBI Director James Comey's Resignation 'Would Not Be a Bad Thing'
	Jan 15, 2017


http://thehill.com/policy/national-security/314391-pence-on-whether-trump-has-confidence-in-comey-youll-have-to-ask-him
	Pence dodges on Trump's confidence in Comey: 'You'll have to ask him'
	01/15/17 09:39 AM EST 


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-15-17-reince-priebus-sen-bernie/story?id=44778012&cid=clicksource_903_null_vert_hed
	Jan 15, 2017

	 STEPHANOPOULOS: We just heard Bernie Sanders say he thinks that FBI Director James Comey should think about stepping down. President-elect Trump was very tough on the FBI director during the campaign, said he disagreed with his final decision on Hillary Clinton, repeated again this week that he thinks Hillary Clinton was guilty as hell.

	Does he have confidence in FBI Director Comey?

	PRIEBUS: Yes, he has confidence in Director Comey. We have had a great relationship with him over the last several weeks. He's extremely competent.

	But, look, his term extends for some time yet. There's no plans at the moment in changing that term. And we've enjoyed our relationship with him and find him to be extraordinarily competent. 


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/brennan-rips-trump-tweets-russia/
	Outgoing CIA chief rips into Trump on Russia threat

 	January 15, 2017 


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/314436-trump-on-outgoing-cia-director-was-this-the-leaker-of-fake-news
	Trump on outgoing CIA director: ‘Was this the leaker of Fake News?’

	01/15/17 08:47 PM EST


http://www.foxnews.com/politics/2017/01/17/cias-brennan-rejects-donald-trumps-criticism-says-dossier-didnt-come-from-intel-community.html
	CIA's Brennan rejects Donald Trump's criticism, says dossier didn't come from intel community

	Published January 17, 2017

	The day after the dossier's contents were published by BuzzFeed, Trump posted on Twitter that intelligence agencies "should never have allowed this fake news to 'leak'" before asking "Are we living in Nazi Germany?"

	Brennan was reportedly indignant that Trump attacked his fellow spies, according to The Journal. He mentioned Trumps tweet on Nazi Germany in particular.

	“Tell the families of those 117 CIA officers who are forever memorialized on our wall of honor that their loved ones who gave their lives were akin to Nazis,” Brennan said. “Tell the CIA officers who are serving in harm’s way right now and their families who are worried about them that they are akin to Nazi Germany. I found that to be very repugnant, and I will forever stand up for the integrity and patriotism of my officers who have done much over the years to sacrifice for their fellow citizens.”


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2017/jan/18/donald-trump-to-reform-us-intelligence-community/
	Donald Trump to reform intelligence

	 By Bill Gertz - - Wednesday, January 18, 2017

	One national security priority of the incoming administration of President-elect Donald Trumpis to reform the heavily bureaucratized and, to some critics, politicized U.S. intelligence community.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/us-counterintelligence-officials-are-examining-possible-ties-between-russia-and-trump-associates/2017/01/19/7e10f31c-debd-11e6-918c-99ede3c8cafa_story.html
	U.S. counterintelligence officials are examining possible ties between Russia and Trump associates
	By Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller
	January 19

	U.S. counterintelligence officials are sifting through intercepted communications and financial data as part of a wider look at possible ties between the Russian government and associates of President-elect Donald Trump, officials said.

	...FBI Director James B. Comey has been chastised by Democratic lawmakers for refusing to even acknowledge that it was investigating alleged links between Trump or his associates and the Kremlin.

	Trump’s former campaign chairman, Paul Manafort, has been under FBI scrutiny for some time, including for allegations of illegal financial dealings in Ukraine, current and former U.S. officials said. Manafort has done business in Russia and Ukraine.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/19/us/politics/trump-russia-associates-investigation.html
	Intercepted Russian Communications Part of Inquiry Into Trump Associates

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT, MATTHEW ROSENBERG, ADAM GOLDMAN and MATT APUZZO
	JAN. 19, 2017

	American law enforcement and intelligence agencies are examining intercepted communications and financial transactions as part of a broad investigation into possible links between Russian officials and associates of President-elect Donald J. Trump, including his former campaign chairman Paul Manafort, current and former senior American officials said.

	The continuing counterintelligence investigation means that Mr. Trump will take the oath of office on Friday with his associates under investigation and after the intelligence agencies concluded that the Russian government had worked to help elect him. As president, Mr. Trump will oversee those agencies and have the authority to redirect or stop at least some of these efforts.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/01/21/trump-to-visit-cia-headquarters-after-sharply-criticizing-the-intelligence-community/
	Trump visits CIA headquarters after sharply criticizing the intelligence community
	By Philip Rucker and Greg Miller
	January 21

	President Trump visited CIA's headquarters in Northern Virginia on Saturday afternoon, making a gesture of goodwill after he harshly criticized the intelligence community in the run-up to his inauguration.

	“There is nobody that feels stronger about the intelligence community and the CIA than Donald Trump,” said Trump.


http://thehill.com/policy/national-security/intelligence/315483-trump-blames-intel-community-feud-on-dishonest-media
	Trump blames intel community 'feud' on ‘dishonest media’
	By Max Greenwood - 01/21/17 04:51 PM EST 


https://www.c-span.org/video/?c4650720/president-trump-tells-cia-us-may-another-chance-get-iraqi-oil
	January 21, 2017 | Clip Of President Trump Remarks at the Central Intelligence Agency
	President Trump Tells CIA U.S. May Have Another Chance to Get Iraqi Oil

	Speaking to employees at CIA headquarters in Langley, Virginia, President Trump said the U.S. should have kept the oil when it left Iraq, saying it would have prevented ISIS. He then suggested, "Maybe we'll have another chance."


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/315568-trump-greets-comey-at-white-house-hes-become-more-famous-than-me
	Trump greets Comey: 'He's become more famous than me'
	01/22/17

	President Donald Trump greeted FBI Director James Comey during a reception for law enforcement at the White House on Sunday afternoon.

	During the event, the president singled out Comey, who approached the president, shook his hand and gave him a hug.

	"He's become more famous than me," the president joked.

	...The president had in the past attacked Comey and the intelligence community, accusing it of leaking an unverified dossier alleging Russia had compromising information on Trump.

	The president also thanked the law enforcement officers for doing such a good job during his inauguration.

	He said the event had been "such a success, a safety success."

	Trump went to the Central Intelligence Agency headquarters on Saturday, where he blasted reporters and affirmed his support for the nation’s intelligence agencies.

	On Sunday, he tweeted that he had a "great" meeting at the CIA headquarters with "amazing people," calling it a "win."


Trump continued to fight with the USIC, but after the Washington Post and NY Times reported that Trump's campaign was under investigation, he abruptly changed his tune, praising the CIA and FBI and making friendly public gestures to Comey. According to the NY Times and Washington Post, Trump had decided to keep Comey as FBI director, even though Trump had told 60 minutes he wanted to meet with Comey first. Also, Trump might honestly think the CIA wants "another chance" to "get Iraq's oil."


http://www.latimes.com/sns-bc-us--comey-in-the-room-20170608-story.html
 	Comey and Trump: 2 alpha males face off over dinner

	The setting: the Green Room, dinner for two. No witnesses but the Navy stewards shuttling in and out with food and drinks.

	...GREEN ROOM, Jan. 27: "Honest loyalty"

	...The conversation is strange from the start: Trump asks whether Comey wants to keep his job even though the FBI director had twice before told Trump he wanted to stay on.

	... Things get stranger from there, when Trump tells Comey: "I need loyalty, I expect loyalty."

	...Trump returns to the salacious allegations against him, calling them disgusting and saying he's considering ordering Comey to investigate and disprove them. Comey warns that such an investigation could "create a narrative that we were investigating him personally, which we weren't."


http://www.cnn.com/2017/06/07/politics/james-comey-memos-testimony/index.html
	January 6 Briefing

	...I discussed with the FBI's leadership team whether I should be prepared to assure President-Elect Trump that we were not investigating him personally. ...During our one-on-one meeting at Trump Tower, based on President Elect Trump's reaction to the briefing and without him directly asking the question, I offered that assurance.


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: Let me ask you about your termination letter to Mr. Comey. You write, "I greatly appreciate you informing me on three separate occasions that I am not under investigation." Why did you put that in there?

	TRUMP: Because he told me that. I mean, he told me that.

	HOLT: He told you, you weren't under investigation with...

	TRUMP: Yeah, and I...

	HOLT: ...regard to the Russian investigation.

	TRUMP: ...I've heard that -- I've heard that from others. I think...

	HOLT: Was it in a phone call? Did you meet face to face?

	TRUMP: I had a dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. We had a very nice dinner at the White House...

	HOLT: He -- he asked...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: ...very early on. That dinner was arranged. I think he asked for the dinner.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	KING: With regard to the — several of these conversations, in his interview with Lester Holt on NBC, the president said, I had dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. Is this an accurate statement?

	COMEY: No, sir.

	KING: Did you in any way initiate that dinner?

	COMEY: No. He called me at my desk at lunchtime and asked me, was I free for dinner that night. Called himself. Said, can you come over for dinner tonight? I said, yes, sir. 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/24/us/politics/trump-comey-fbi-director-.html
	Trump Is Said to Keep James Comey as F.B.I. Director

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT and ADAM GOLDMAN JAN. 24, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — The F.B.I. director, James B. Comey, told his top agents from around the country that he had been asked by President Trump to stay on the job running the federal government’s top law enforcement agency, according to people familiar with the matter.

	...When Mr. Comey and the president-elect met at Trump Tower for the first time this month for an intelligence briefing, Mr. Trump told the F.B.I. director that he hoped he would remain in his position, according to people briefed on the matter. And Mr. Trump’s aides have made it clear to Mr. Comey that the president does not plan to ask him to leave, these people said.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-director-james-comey-to-say-on-in-trump-administration/2017/01/24/033d3bc8-e246-11e6-a453-19ec4b3d09ba_story.html
 	FBI Director James Comey to stay on in Trump administration

	By Matt Zapotosky, Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller January 24

	...The news that Comey would stay in place became public Tuesday, some time after he began informing senior FBI officials around the country that he had been asked to continue.

	Under normal circumstances, the revelation might have been unsurprising: Comey is less than four years into a 10-year term, and it is extremely rare for a president to remove an FBI director. But President Trump had notably declined to say whether he would keep the FBI director, telling “60 Minutes” in an interview after his election that he wanted to meet with Comey first. 


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	...And he wanted to stay on as the FBI head. And I said I'll, you know, consider. We'll see what happens.

	But we had a very nice dinner. And at that time, he told you are not under investigation...

	HOLT: That was...

	TRUMP: ...which I knew anyway.

	HOLT: That was one meeting. When was the -- when was the other two?

	TRUMP: First of all, when you're under investigation, you're giving all sorts of documents and everything. I knew I wasn't under. And I heard it was stated at the committee -- at some committee level that I wasn't, number one.

	HOLT: So, that didn't come directly from him.

	TRUMP: Then, during a phone call, he said it. And then, during another phone call he said it.

	So, he said it once at dinner and then he said it twice during phone calls.

	HOLT: Did -- did you call him?

	TRUMP: In one case I called him and one case he called me.

	HOLT: And did you ask am I under investigation?

	TRUMP: I actually asked him, yes. I said if it's possible, would you let me know am I under investigation. He said you are not under investigation.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. SUSAN COLLINS: ...I want first to ask you about your conversations with the president, three conversations in which you told him that he was not under investigation. The first was during your January 6th meeting, according to your testimony, in which it appears that you actually volunteered that assurance. Is that correct?

	COMEY: That's correct.

	...COLLINS: Then on the January 27th dinner, you told the president that he should be careful about asking you to investigate because, “you might create a narrative that we are investigating him personally, which we weren't.” Again, were you limiting that statement to counterintelligence investigations, or more broadly, such as a criminal investigation?

	COMEY: I didn't modify the word investigation. It was, again, he was reacting strongly against the unverified material, saying I'm tempted to order you to investigate it. In the context of that, I said, sir, be careful about it. I might create a narrative we're investigating you personally. 

	
https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	YATES: I had two in-person meetings and one phone call with the White House Counsel about Mr. Flynn. The first meeting occurred on January 26, called Don McGahn first thing that morning and told him that I had a very sensitive matter that I needed to discuss with him, that I couldn't talk about it on the phone and that I needed to come see him. And he agreed to meet with me later that afternoon.

	...DURBIN: ...Ms. Yates, let me ask you about this meeting on January the 26th with White House Counsel Don McGahn. You shared the Justice Department's concern about his communications with Russia, his apparent dishonesty about those communications and his vulnerability to blackmail. Is that correct?

	YATES: That's right.

	...YATES: ...One of the -- one of the issues that Mr. McGahn raised with me in this second meeting that again was on the 27th, the day after the first meeting, was his concern because we had told him before that we were giving him this information so that they could take action.

	And he said that they were concerned that taking action might interfere with the FBI investigation.


https://lawfareblog.com/what-do-we-know-about-investigations-trump-associates-ties-russia
	What Do We Know About Investigations Into Trump Associates’ Ties to Russia?

	By Susan Hennessey, Jordan Brunner

	On Sunday night, the Wall Street Journal broke a story that U.S. counterintelligence officials “had investigated” the communications of National Security Advisor Michael Flynn as part of a counterintelligence inquiry. This set off a storm of contradicting reports, with the Washington Post asserting that Flynn had been cleared and was not part of the broader investigation into Trump associates’ ties to Russia, and then still other outlets reporting that in fact the investigation was still ongoing.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-to-russia-1485134942
https://www.dowjones.com/scoops/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-russia/
	U.S. Eyes Michael Flynn’s Links to Russia
	By Carol E. Lee, Devlin Barrett andShane Harris
	Jan. 22, 2017 8:29 p.m. ET 

	Counterintelligence agents have investigated communications by President Trump’s national security adviser, including phone calls to Russian ambassador in late December

	Michael Flynn is the first person inside the White House under Mr. Trump whose communications are known to have faced scrutiny as part of investigations by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Central Intelligence Agency, National Security Agency and Treasury Department to determine the extent of Russian government contacts with people close to Mr. Trump.

	It isn’t clear when the counterintelligence inquiry began, whether it produced any incriminating evidence or if it is continuing. Mr. Flynn, a retired general who became national security adviser with Mr. Trump’s inauguration, plays a key role in setting U.S. policy toward Russia.

	The counterintelligence inquiry aimed to determine the nature of Mr. Flynn’s contact with Russian officials and whether such contacts may have violated laws, people familiar with the matter said.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-reviewed-flynns-calls-with-russian-ambassador-but-found-nothing-illicit/2017/01/23/aa83879a-e1ae-11e6-a547-5fb9411d332c_story.html
 	FBI reviewed Flynn’s calls with Russian ambassador but found nothing illicit 

	By Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller January 23

	The FBI in late December reviewed intercepts of communications between the Russian ambassador to the United States and retired Lt. Gen. Michael T. Flynn — national security adviser to then-President-elect Trump — but has not found any evidence of wrongdoing or illicit ties to the Russian government, U.S. officials said.

	...Although Flynn’s contacts with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak were listened to, Flynn himself is not the active target of an investigation, U.S. officials said. The Wall Street Journal reported Sunday that U.S. counterintelligence agents had investigated the communications between Flynn and Kislyak.


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/report-fbi-clears-flynn-of-wrongdoing-in-talk-with-russian-ambassador/article/2612774
	...The Post reported Flynn did not commit any wrongdoing and there is no evidence of illicit ties between him and the Russian government.


http://dailycaller.com/2017/01/23/report-probe-of-michael-flynns-russia-phone-calls-found-nothing-illicit/
	...Michael Flynn, was not the target of a counter-intelligence investigation of his contacts with Russia’s ambassador to the U.S., contrary to reports on Sunday suggesting that he was, according to The Washington Post.


http://www.breitbart.com/national-security/2017/01/25/fbi-nothing-illicit-flynns-calls-russian-ambassador/
	...The Post flatly states that “Flynn himself is not the active target of an investigation, U.S. officials said.”

	Other reports, such as a Sunday posting from the Wall Street Journal, have said it was unclear if any Flynn investigations were still in progress.


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/2016-election/trump-revokes-washington-post-s-press-credentials-n591586
	Jun 13 2016, 6:22 pm ET
	Trump Revokes Washington Post’s Press Credentials

	by Andrew Rafferty and Alex Seitz-Wald

 	Unhappy with "incredibly inaccurate coverage," Donald Trump on Monday announced he would revoke the Washington Post's press credentials.

	“The Washington Post unfortunately covers Mr. Trump very inaccurately. Today's headline, 'Donald Trump Suggests President Obama Was Involved With Orlando Shooting' is a perfect example. We no longer feel compelled to work with a publication which has put its need for "clicks" above journalistic integrity,” Trump’s campaign said in a statement.


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	TRUMP: ...As far as the general's concerned, when I first heard about it, I said huh, that doesn't sound wrong. My counsel came, Don McGahn, White House Counsel, and he told me and I asked him, he can speak very well for himself. He said he doesn't think anything is wrong, you know, really didn't think.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	YATES: ...we told him, both the senior career official and I, that he should not be concerned with it, that General Flynn had been interviewed, that their action would not interfere with any investigation and in fact, I remember specifically saying, you know it wouldn't really be fair of us to tell you this and then expect you to sit on your hands.


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	...It was really, what happened after that but he didn't think anything was done wrong. I didn't either because I waited a period of time and I started to think about it, I said "well I don't see" -- to me, he was doing the job.

	The information was provided by -- who I don't know, Sally Yates. And I was a little surprised because I said "doesn't sound like he did anything wrong there." But he did something wrong with respect to the vice president and I thought that was not acceptable. As far as -- as far as the actual making the call, fact I've watched various programs and I've read various articles where he was just doing his job.

	That was very normal. You know, first everybody got excited because they thought he did something wrong. After they thought about it, it turned out he was just doing his job. So -- and I do. And by the way, with all of that being said, I do think he's a fine man.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-to-russia-1485134942
https://www.dowjones.com/scoops/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-russia/
	U.S. Eyes Michael Flynn’s Links to Russia
	By Carol E. Lee, Devlin Barrett andShane Harris
	Jan. 22, 2017 8:29 p.m. ET 

	...In a statement Sunday night, the White House said it has “absolutely no knowledge of any investigation or even a basis for such an investigation.”


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	TRUMP: ...And I'll tell you something, I'll be honest, because I sort of enjoy this back and forth that I guess I have all my life but I've never seen more dishonest media than frankly, the political media. I thought the financial media was much better, much more honest.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-to-russia-1485134942
https://www.dowjones.com/scoops/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-russia/
	U.S. Eyes Michael Flynn’s Links to Russia
	By Carol E. Lee, Devlin Barrett andShane Harris
	Jan. 22, 2017 8:29 p.m. ET 

	...A key issue in the investigation is a series of telephone calls Mr. Flynn made to Sergey Kislyak, the Russian ambassador to the U.S.

	...Officials also have examined earlier conversations between Mr. Flynn and Russian figures, the people familiar with the matter said. Russia has previously denied involvement in election-related hacking.





https://www.wsj.com/articles/gop-operative-sought-clinton-emails-from-hackers-implied-a-connection-to-flynn-1498770851
https://www.msn.com/en-us/news/politics/gop-operative-sought-clinton-emails-from-hackers-implied-a-connection-to-flynn/ar-BBDtlhy
	GOP Operative Sought Clinton Emails From Hackers, Implied a Connection to Flynn

	Peter W. Smith portrayed the former general as an ally in an effort, independent of the Trump campaign, to find personal emails deleted by Hillary Clinton
	By Shane Harris

 	June 29, 2017 5:14 p.m. ET

	WASHINGTON—Before the 2016 presidential election, a longtime Republican opposition researcher mounted an independent campaign to obtain emails he believed were stolen from Hillary Clinton’s private server, likely by Russian hackers.

	In conversations with members of his circle and with others he tried to recruit to help him, the GOP operative, Peter W. Smith, implied he was working with retired Lt. Gen. Mike Flynn, at the time a senior adviser to then-candidate Donald Trump. 

	“He said, ‘I’m talking to Michael Flynn about this — if you find anything, can you let me know?’” said Eric York, a computer-security expert from Atlanta who searched hacker forums on Mr. Smith’s behalf for people who might have access to the emails.

	Emails written by Mr. Smith and one of his associates show that his small group considered Mr. Flynn and his consulting company, Flynn Intel Group, to be allies in their quest.

	What role, if any, Mr. Flynn may have played in Mr. Smith’s project is unclear. In an interview with The Wall Street Journal, Mr. Smith said he knew Mr. Flynn, but he never stated that Mr. Flynn was involved.

	Mr. Flynn didn’t respond to requests for comment.


	...In the interview with the Journal, Mr. Smith said he and his colleagues found five groups of hackers who claimed to possess Mrs. Clinton’s deleted emails, including two groups he determined were Russians.

	“We knew the people who had these were probably around the Russian government,” Mr. Smith said.

	U.S. intelligence agencies have accused the Russians of stealing emails from the Democratic National Committee and Mrs. Clinton’s campaign chairman, John Podesta, and providing them to WikiLeaks last summer as part of a multifaceted operation to interfere with the election and help Mr. Trump’s campaign. Mr. Trump on July 27 publicly encouraged Russia to go further and find the Clinton “emails that are missing.” Asked about that on Monday, White House press secretary Sean Spicer said Mr. Trump was joking.

	Mr. Smith said after vetting batches of emails offered to him by hacker groups last fall, he couldn’t be sure enough of their authenticity to leak them himself. “We told all the groups to give them to WikiLeaks,” he said. WikiLeaks has never published those emails or claimed to have them.

	Mr. Smith and one of his associates said they had a line of communication with Mr. Flynn and his consulting company.

	In one Smith email reviewed by the Journal, intended to entice outside experts to join his work, he offered to make introductions to Mr. Flynn’s son, Michael G. Flynn, who worked as chief of staff in his father’s company. Mr. Smith’s email mentioned the son among a small number of other people he said were helping.

	Michael G. Flynn didn’t respond to a request for comment.

	In another recruiting email seen by the Journal, Jonathan Safron, a law student Mr. Smith described as a close colleague, included links to the websites and LinkedIn profiles of people purportedly working with the Smith team. At the top of the list was the name and website of Flynn Intel, which Mr. Flynn set up after his 2014 firing as director of the Defense Intelligence Agency.

	Mr. Safron declined to comment on his email or Mr. Smith’s project.

	In phone conversations, Mr. Smith told a computer expert he was in direct contact with Mr. Flynn and his son, according to this expert. The person said an anti-Clinton research document prepared by Mr. Smith’s group identified the younger Mr. Flynn as someone associated with the effort. The expert said that based on his conversations with Mr. Smith, he understood the elder Mr. Flynn to be coordinating with Mr. Smith’s group in his capacity as a Trump campaign adviser.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/06/08/us/politics/senate-hearing-transcript.html
	BLUNT: The — any suggestion that the — that General Flynn had violated the Logan Act, I always find pretty incredible. The Logan Act’s been on the books for over 200 years. Nobody’s ever been prosecuted for violating the Logan Act.

	My sense would be that the discussion — not the problem — misleading investigators or the vice president might have been.

	COMEY: That’s fair. Yes, sir.

	BLUNT: And — and you’re — had you previously, on February the 14th, discussed with the president, in the previous meeting, anything your investigators had learned, or their impressions from talking to Flynn?

	COMEY: No, sir.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	BLUMENTHAL: ...The meeting that the FBI conducted on January 24th preceded by one day, approximately, your first meeting with Donald McGahn. Isn't it a fact that Michael Flynn lied to the FBI?

	YATES: And I can't reveal the internal FBI investigation, Senator, even though it's not -- even though part would not be technically classified, it's on ongoing investigation and I can't reveal that.

	BLUMENTHAL: Did you tell Donald McGahn that then-National Security Adviser Flynn told the truth to the FBI?

	YATES: No, he asked me how he had done in the interview, and I specifically declined to answer that.

	BLUMENTHAL: Because it was part of an investigation?

	YATES: That's right.

	BLUMENTHAL: Was that intended to indicate to him that Michael Flynn had a problem in that interview?

	YATES: No, I was intending to let him know that Michael Flynn had a problem on a lot of levels, but it wasn't necessarily with respect to how he performed in the interview. I was intentionally not letting him know how the interview had gone.
	
	...YATES: ...The first topic in the second meeting was essentially why does it matter to DOJ if one White House official lies to another. The second topic related to the applicability of criminal statutes and the likelihood that the Department of Justice would pursue a criminal case. The third topic was his concern that their taking action might interfere with an investigation of Mr. Flynn. And the fourth topic was his request to see the underlying evidence.

	...YATES: ...And there was a request made by Mr. McGahn, in the second meeting as to whether or not they would be able to look at the underlying evidence that we had that we had described for him of General Flynn's conduct. And we told him that we were inclined to allow them to look at that underlying evidence, that we wanted to go back to DOJ and be able to make the logistical arrangements for that. This second meeting on the 27th occurred late in the afternoon, this is Friday the 27th. 

	...WHITEHOUSE: Did you discuss criminal prosecution of Mr. Flynn -- General Flynn?

	YATES: My recollection is that did not really come up much in the first meeting. It did come up in the second meeting, when Mr. McGahn called me back the next morning and asked the -- the morning after -- this is the morning of the 27th, now -- and asked me if I could come back to his office.

	And so I went back with the NSD official, and there were essentially four topics that he wanted to discuss there, and one of those topics was precisely that. He asked about the applicability of certain statutes, certain criminal statutes and, more specifically, about...


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	January 27 Dinner

	The President and I had dinner on Friday, January 27 at 6:30 pm in the Green Room at the White House. He had called me at lunchtime that day and invited me to dinner that night

	...The President began by asking me whether I wanted to stay on as FBI Director, which I found strange because he had already told me twice in earlier conversations that he hoped I would stay, and I had assured him that I intended to. He said that lots of people wanted my job and, given the abuse I had taken during the previous year, he would understand if I wanted to walk away.

	My instincts told me that the one-on-one setting, and the pretense that this was our first discussion about my position, meant the dinner was, at least in part, an effort to have me ask for my job and create some sort of patronage relationship. That concerned me greatly, given the FBI’s traditionally independent status in the executive branch.

	I replied that I loved my work and intended to stay and serve out my ten-year term as Director. And then, because the set-up made me uneasy, I added that I was not “reliable” in the way politicians use that word, but he could always count on me to tell him the truth. I added that I was not on anybody’s side politically and could not be counted on in the traditional political sense, a stance I said was in his best interest as the President.

	A few moments later, the President said, “I need loyalty, I expect loyalty.” I didn’t move, speak, or change my facial expression in any way during the awkward silence that followed. We simply looked at each other in silence. The conversation then moved on, but he returned to the subject near the end of our dinner.

	At one point, I explained why it was so important that the FBI and the Department of Justice be independent of the White House. I said it was a paradox: Throughout history, some Presidents have decided that because “problems” come from Justice, they should try to hold the Department close. But blurring those boundaries ultimately makes the problems worse by undermining public trust in the institutions and their work.

	Near the end of our dinner, the President returned to the subject of my job, saying he was very glad I wanted to stay, adding that he had heard great things about me from Jim Mattis, Jeff Sessions, and many others. He then said, “I need loyalty.” I replied, “You will always get honesty from me.” He paused and then said, “That’s what I want, honest loyalty.” I paused, and then said, “You will get that from me.” As I wrote in the memo I created immediately after the dinner, it is possible we understood the phrase “honest loyalty” differently, but I decided it wouldn’t be productive to push it further. The term – honest loyalty – had helped end a very awkward conversation and my explanations had made clear what he should expect.

	During the dinner, the President returned to the salacious material I had briefed him about on January 6, and, as he had done previously, expressed his disgust for the allegations and strongly denied them. He said he was considering ordering me to investigate the alleged incident to prove it didn’t happen. I replied that he should give that careful thought because it might create a narrative that we were investigating him personally, which we weren’t, and because it was very difficult to prove a negative. He said he would think about it and asked me to think about it.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. RON WYDEN: ...In talking to senator Warner about this dinner that you had with the president, I believe January 27th, all in one dinner, the president raised your job prospects, he asked for your loyalty and denied allegations against him. All took place over one supper. Now, you told senator Warner that the president was looking to, quote, get something. Looking back, did that dinner suggest that your job might be contingent on how you handled the investigation?

	COMEY: I don't know that I'd go that far. I got the sense my job would be contingent upon how he felt I — excuse me — how he felt I conducted myself and whether I demonstrated loyalty. But I don't know whether I'd go so far as to connect it to the investigation. 


Supposedly, Trump learns from media reports that the FBI scrutinized Flynn's calls to the Russian ambassador but that he "didn't do anything wrong." Shortly after Trump is warned that Flynn lied to Pence and is vulnerable to blackmail, he asks for Comey's "loyalty" in a one-on-one meeting. According to their testimonies, neither Yates nor Comey told the White House that Flynn might have misled the FBI. Trump seems to be very keen on shooting-down the allegations in the "dirty dossier," and asks Comey to prove they are false.


http://www.christianpost.com/news/trump-to-prioritize-persecuted-christians-as-refugees-173681/
	By Anugrah Kumar , Christian Post Contributor
	Jan 28, 2017 

	President Donald Trump signed new orders to "keep radical Islamic terrorists out of the United States of America" and pledged to give priority to persecuted Christians as refugees.


https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/01/30/us/document-Letter-From-Sally-Yates.html
	Letter From Sally Yates

	Jan 30, 2017

	...Its review does not take account of statements made by an administration or its surrogates close in time to the issuance of an Executive Order that may bear on the order's purpose.

	...I am not convinced that the defense of the Executive Order is consistent with these responsibilities nor am I convinced that the Executive Order is lawful.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	YATES: Right, so that that would not have a negative impact on the FBI investigation at that point.

	And there was a request made by Mr. McGahn, in the second meeting as to whether or not they would be able to look at the underlying evidence that we had that we had described for him of General Flynn's conduct. And we told him that we were inclined to allow them to look at that underlying evidence, that we wanted to go back to DOJ and be able to make the logistical arrangements for that.

	...YATES: Two meetings and then a phone call at the end to let him know...

	WHITEHOUSE: That the material was available if he wanted to see it.

	YATES: ... that the material was available. He had to call me back. He was not available then and I did not hear back from him until that afternoon of Monday the 30th.

	WHITEHOUSE: And that was the end of this episode, nobody came over to look at the material?

	YATES: I don't know what happened after that because that was my last day with DOJ.


https://www.bostonglobe.com/news/politics/2017/01/30/read-full-white-house-statement-sally-yates/HkFReIYJidU9deDelPK6SM/story.html
	January 31, 2017

	 The White House has fired acting Attorney General Sally Yates, a Democratic appointee, after she directed Justice Department attorneys not to defend President Donald Trump’s controversial executive refugee and immigration ban.

	The following is the full White House statement:

	“The acting Attorney General, Sally Yates, has betrayed the Department of Justice by refusing to enforce a legal order designed to protect the citizens of the United States. This order was approved as to form and legality by the Department of Justice Office of Legal Counsel.

	Ms. Yates is an Obama Administration appointee who is weak on borders and very weak on illegal immigration.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2017/02/02/the-leaks-coming-out-of-the-trump-white-house-right-now-are-totally-bananas/
	The leaks coming out of the Trump White House right now are totally bananas
	By Chris Cillizza February 2

	Here are a few leaks that have come out of the Trump administration in just the last 24 hours:

	* President Trump abruptly ended a phone call with Australian Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull after condemning a refugee deal with the country and telling Turnbull "this was the worst call by far" he has had with a world leader.

	* Trump threatened — his administration insisted it was "light-hearted" — Mexican President Enrique Peña Nieto with sending American troops into his country.

	* The White House asked Judge Thomas Hardiman to drive toward D.C. to amp up the drama in advance of Trump's Supreme Court pick on Tuesday night. (Hardiman was passed over in favor of Colorado federal appeals court judge Neil Gorsuch.)

	...What's truly remarkable is that the leaking appears to be growing even more frequent and even more deleterious to President Trump's image within just the last few days.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-leaks-idUSKBN15I321
	Fri Feb 3, 2017 | 6:32pm EST
	White House investigates leaks of Trump calls to Australia, Mexico

	The White House is looking into how embarrassing details of President Donald Trump's recent tense phone conversations with his counterparts in Australia and Mexico were leaked to news organizations, White House spokesman Sean Spicer said on Fox News Channel.

	"The president takes these leaks very seriously," Spicer said in an interview with Fox News Channel, which on Friday provided a transcript of a segment set to air on Saturday.


http://www.foxnews.com/politics/2017/02/06/trump-leaked-transcripts-mexico-australia-calls-disgraceful.html
	Trump: Leaked transcripts of Mexico, Australia calls 'disgraceful'
	Published February 06, 2017

	Trump, speaking to Fox News, accused “Obama people” of giving news organizations embarrassing details of his recent tense phone conversations with his Australian and Mexican counterparts, and said that the holdovers from the Obama administration still serving on his White House and National Security Council staff were being replaced.

	“It’s a disgrace that they leaked because it’s very much against our country,” Trump said, without stating why he believed that career civil servants who work in Democratic and Republican administrations were the source of the leaks. “It’s a very dangerous thing for this country,” he said.


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/318621-trump-white-house-besieged-by-leaks
	Trump White House besieged by leaks

	By Niall Stanage - 02/09/17 

	Donald Trump’s White House has sprung a remarkable number of leaks since his inauguration.

	The question is where they’re coming from.

	Barely a day goes by without some unusual tale emerging from 1600 Pennsylvania Ave. Recent examples in a single New York Times story included the assertion that White House aides have held meetings in the dark because they can’t figure out how the lights work and that the president is fond of watching television alone in his bathrobe.

	Trump took to Twitter to assert that the Times “writes total fiction” about him, while White House press secretary Sean Spicer insisted that the president does not even own a bathrobe.

	More serious matters have been leaked as well, such as descriptions of Trump’s call with Australian Prime Minister Malcolm Turnbull. Trump apparently said a U.S.-Australia deal on refugees, agreed to by President Obama, was “the worst deal ever,” and told Turnbull their conversation was “the worst call by far” among several he had held with world leaders that day.

	The leakiness of the Trump White House has been a boon to the press corps, who find themselves feasting on the juicy insider details that were hard to come by during the “No Drama Obama” years.

	But to those rooting for a successful Trump presidency, the picture looks very different.

	“There have been a ton of leaks. It seems that everyone has their own leaking apparatus,” lamented one Trump ally who works outside the White House.

	...The speculation about who’s up and who’s down among Trump’s cadre of advisors won’t subside anytime soon, however.

	In part, that’s because any leak that emerges is immediately parsed for clues as to the source — and whom they might be intending to harm.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/national-security-adviser-flynn-discussed-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador-despite-denials-officials-say/2017/02/09/f85b29d6-ee11-11e6-b4ff-ac2cf509efe5_story.html
 	National security adviser Flynn discussed sanctions with Russian ambassador, despite denials, officials say 

	By Greg Miller, Adam Entous and Ellen Nakashima February 9

	National security adviser Michael Flynn privately discussed U.S. sanctions against Russia with that country’s ambassador to the United States during the month before President Trump took office, contrary to public assertions by Trump officials, current and former U.S. officials said.

	Flynn’s communications with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak were interpreted by some senior U.S. officials as an inappropriate and potentially illegal signal to the Kremlin that it could expect a reprieve from sanctions that were being imposed by the Obama administration in late December to punish Russia for its alleged interference in the 2016 election.

	Flynn on Wednesday denied that he had discussed sanctions with Kislyak. Asked in an interview whether he had ever done so, he twice said, “No.”


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/09/us/flynn-is-said-to-have-talked-to-russians-about-sanctions-before-trump-took-office.html
	Flynn Is Said to Have Talked to Russians About Sanctions Before Trump Took Office

	By MATTHEW ROSENBERG and MATT APUZZO
	FEB. 9, 2017

	Weeks before President Trump’s inauguration, his national security adviser, Michael T. Flynn, discussed American sanctions against Russia, as well as areas of possible cooperation, with that country’s ambassador to the United States, according to current and former American officials.

	Throughout the discussions, the message Mr. Flynn conveyed to the ambassador, Sergey I. Kislyak — that the Obama administration was Moscow’s adversary and that relations with Russia would change under Mr. Trump — was unambiguous and highly inappropriate, the officials said.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/02/mike-flynn-nsa-aide-trump-234923
	CIA freezes out top Flynn aide

	The agency denied a security clearance for a key aide to the National Security Adviser — ratcheting up tensions between Flynn and the intel community.

	By Kenneth P. Vogel and Josh Dawsey

	02/10/2017 10:16 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/justice-department-warned-white-house-that-flynn-could-be-vulnerable-to-russian-blackmail-officials-say/2017/02/13/fc5dab88-f228-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	Justice Department warned White House that Flynn could be vulnerable to Russian blackmail, officials say 

	By Adam Entous, Ellen Nakashima and Philip Rucker February 13

	The acting attorney general informed the Trump White House late last month that she believed Michael Flynn had misled senior administration officials about the nature of his communications with the Russian ambassador to the United States, and warned that the national security adviser was potentially vulnerable to Russian blackmail, current and former U.S. officials said.


https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/02/13/us/politics/document-Michael-Flynn-Resignation-Letter.html
	Michael Flynn’s Resignation Letter

	February 13

	"I inadvertently briefed the Vice President Elect and others with incomplete information regarding my phone calls with the Russian Ambassador. I have sincerely apologized to the President and the Vice President, and they have accepted my apology."


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831510532318429184
	The real story here is why are there so many illegal leaks coming out of Washington? Will these leaks be happening as I deal on N.Korea etc?
	6:28 AM - 14 Feb 2017 


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	February 14 Oval Office Meeting

	On February 14, I went to the Oval Office for a scheduled counter-terrorism briefing of the President. He sat behind the desk and a group of us sat in a semi-circle of about six chairs facing him on the other side of the desk. The Vice President, Deputy Director of the CIA, Director of the National Counter-Terrorism Center, Secretary of Homeland Security, the Attorney General, and I were in the semi-circle of chairs.

	...The President signaled the end of the briefing by thanking the group and telling them all that he wanted to speak to me alone. I stayed in my chair. As the participants started to leave the Oval Office, the Attorney General lingered by my chair, but the President thanked him and said he wanted to speak only with me.

	...the President began by saying, “I want to talk about Mike Flynn.” Flynn had resigned the previous day. The President began by saying Flynn hadn’t done anything wrong in speaking with the Russians, but he had to let him go because he had misled the Vice President. He added that he had other concerns about Flynn, which he did not then specify.

	The President then made a long series of comments about the problem with leaks of classified information – a concern I shared and still share. After he had spoken for a few minutes about leaks...

	...The President then returned to the topic of Mike Flynn, saying, “He is a good guy and has been through a lot.” He repeated that Flynn hadn’t done anything wrong on his calls with the Russians, but had misled the Vice President. He then said, “I hope you can see your way clear to letting this go, to letting Flynn go. He is a good guy. I hope you can let this go.” I replied only that “he is a good guy.” (In fact, I had a positive experience dealing with Mike Flynn when he was a colleague as Director of the Defense Intelligence Agency at the beginning of my term at FBI.) I did not say I would “let this go.”

	The President returned briefly to the problem of leaks. I then got up and left out the door by the grandfather clock, making my way through the large group of people waiting there, including Mr. Priebus and the Vice President.

	I immediately prepared an unclassified memo of the conversation about Flynn and discussed the matter with FBI senior leadership. I had understood the President to be requesting that we drop any investigation of Flynn in connection with false statements about his conversations with the Russian ambassador in December. I did not understand the President to be talking about the broader investigation into Russia or possible links to his campaign. I could be wrong, but I took him to be focusing on what had just happened with Flynn’s departure and the controversy around his account of his phone calls. Regardless, it was very concerning, given the FBI’s role as an independent investigative agency.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/14/us/politics/russia-intelligence-communications-trump.html
	Trump Campaign Aides Had Repeated Contacts With Russian Intelligence

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT, MARK MAZZETTI and MATT APUZZO
	FEB. 14, 2017

	WASHINGTON — Phone records and intercepted calls show that members of Donald J. Trump’s 2016 presidential campaign and other Trump associates had repeated contacts with senior Russian intelligence officials in the year before the election, according to four current and former American officials.

	American law enforcement and intelligence agencies intercepted the communications around the same time they were discovering evidence that Russia was trying to disrupt the presidential election by hacking into the Democratic National Committee, three of the officials said. The intelligence agencies then sought to learn whether the Trump campaign was colluding with the Russians on the hacking or other efforts to influence the election.

	The officials interviewed in recent weeks said that, so far, they had seen no evidence of such cooperation.

	But the intercepts alarmed American intelligence and law enforcement agencies, in part because of the amount of contact that was occurring while Mr. Trump was speaking glowingly about the Russian president, Vladimir V. Putin.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831830548565852160
	The fake news media is going crazy with their conspiracy theories and blind hatred. @MSNBC & @CNN are unwatchable. @foxandfriends is great!
	3:40 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831837514226921472
	This Russian connection non-sense is merely an attempt to cover-up the many mistakes made in Hillary Clinton's losing campaign.
	4:08 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/14/us/politics/russia-intelligence-communications-trump.html
	...The National Security Agency, which monitors the communications of foreign intelligence services, initially captured the calls between Mr. Trump’s associates and the Russians as part of routine foreign surveillance. After that, the F.B.I. asked the N.S.A. to collect as much information as possible about the Russian operatives on the phone calls, and to search through troves of previous intercepted communications that had not been analyzed.

	The F.B.I. has closely examined at least three other people close to Mr. Trump, although it is unclear if their calls were intercepted. They are Carter Page, a businessman and former foreign policy adviser to the campaign; Roger Stone, a longtime Republican operative; and Mr. Flynn.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831840306161123328
	Information is being illegally given to the failing @nytimes & @washingtonpost by the intelligence community (NSA and FBI?).Just like Russia
	4:19 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831842652085686273
	Thank you to Eli Lake of The Bloomberg View - "The NSA & FBI...should not interfere in our politics...and is" Very serious situation for USA
	4:28 AM - 15 Feb 2017


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-02-14/the-political-assassination-of-michael-flynn
	The Political Assassination of Michael Flynn
	The national security adviser was the appetizer. Trump is the main course.
	by Eli Lake

	February 14, 2017, 3:09 PM GMT

	If we are to believe the Trump White House, National Security Adviser Michael Flynn just resigned because he lied about his conversations with Russia's ambassador to the vice president. As White House senior counselor Kellyanne Conway told NBC's "Today Show" on Tuesday: "Misleading the vice president really was the key here."

	...A better explanation here is that Flynn was just thrown under the bus.

	...Flynn was a fat target for the national security state. He has cultivated a reputation as a reformer and a fierce critic of the intelligence community leaders he once served with when he was the director the Defense Intelligence Agency under President Barack Obama. Flynn was working to reform the intelligence-industrial complex, something that threatened the bureaucratic prerogatives of his rivals.

	He was also a fat target for Democrats. Remember Flynn's breakout national moment last summer was when he joined the crowd at the Republican National Convention from the dais calling for Hillary Clinton to be jailed.

	...In the end, it was Trump's decision to cut Flynn loose. In doing this he caved in to his political and bureaucratic opposition. Nunes told me Monday night that this will not end well. "First it's Flynn, next it will be Kellyanne Conway, then it will be Steve Bannon, then it will be Reince Priebus," he said. 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831846101179314177
	Crimea was TAKEN by Russia during the Obama Administration. Was Obama too soft on Russia?
	4:42 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/831853862281699331
	The real scandal here is that classified information is illegally given out by "intelligence" like candy. Very un-American!
	5:13 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/15/us/politics/trump-intelligence-agencies-stephen-feinberg.html
	White House Plans to Have Trump Ally Review Intelligence Agencies

	By JAMES RISEN and MATTHEW ROSENBERGFEB. 15, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — President Trump plans to assign a New York billionaire to lead a broad review of American intelligence agencies, according to administration officials, an effort that members of the intelligence community fear could curtail their independence and reduce the flow of information that contradicts the president’s worldview.

	The possible role for Stephen A. Feinberg, a co-founder of Cerberus Capital Management, has met fierce resistance among intelligence officials already on edge because of the criticism the intelligence community has received from Mr. Trump during the campaign and since he became president. On Wednesday, Mr. Trump blamed leaks from the intelligence community for the departure of Michael T. Flynn, his national security adviser, whose resignation he requested.


http://video.foxnews.com/v/5325771485001/?#sp=show-clips
	Trump: Intel leaks will stop as we get our people in place
	Feb. 16, 2017


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	FEBRUARY 16, 2017, 2:55 PM

	Russia is fake news. Russia -- this is fake news put out by the media. The real news is the fact that people, probably from the Obama administration because they're there, because we have our new people going in place, right now.

	As you know, Mike Pompeo has -- has now taken control of the CIA, James Comey at FBI, Dan Coats is waiting to be approved, I mean he is a senator and a highly respected one and he's still waiting to be approved. But our new people are going in.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170216214656/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/flynn-in-fbi-interview-denied-discussing-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador/2017/02/16/e3e1e16a-f3d5-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	Flynn in FBI interview denied discussing sanctions with Russian ambassador 

	By Sari Horwitz and Adam Entous February 16 at 4:37 PM

	Former National Security Adviser Michael Flynn denied to FBI agents in an interview last month that he had discussed U.S. sanctions against Russia with that country’s ambassador to the United States before President Trump took office, contradicting the contents of intercepted communications collected by intelligence agencies, current and former U.S. officials said.

	The Jan. 24 interview potentially puts Flynn in legal jeopardy, as lying to the FBI is a felony


Trump fires Yates under suspicious circumstances and ignores her warning about Flynn, who continues to act as a national security risk (see https://pastebin.com/nCwti01C, https://pastebin.com/YrPgkGCR). After Trump's administration is increasingly inundated by leaks which he blames on leftover Obama officials, The Washington Post and the New York Times leak that Flynn lied about discussing sanctions to Pence and that the White House was warned he was vulnerable to blackmail, and Trump fires Flynn shortly afterward. Trump seems to think he was forced into firing Flynn by leaks.

The next day, Trump singles out Comey to talk to him about Flynn and rant at him about leaks. Trump tells Comey Flynn "didn't do anything wrong" in talking to the Russians, but he had to fire him because he "misled the Vice President." Trump asks Comey "I hope you can see your way clear to letting this go, to letting Flynn go. He is a good guy. I hope you can let this go," although Comey doesn't make clear what exactly Trump wants Comey to "let go." Comey interprets it as Trump asking him to drop any investigation connected with Flynn's statements to the Russians.

Trump continues to publicly rant about leaks from the Intelligence Community and blame them on Obama-appointees.


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/politics-news/schiff-defends-committee-examining-russia-trump-connections-n735391
	Mar 19 2017
	Rep. Schiff: ‘Circumstantial Evidence of Collusion’ Between Trump Campaign, Russia

	Despite denials from some top intelligence officials that there was any evidence of collusion between associates of Donald Trump’s presidential campaign and Russian operatives while Moscow tried to interfere with the 2016 election, Rep. Adam Schiff on Sunday defended the House Intelligence Committee continuing to look into the matter.

	Two weeks ago on "Meet The Press," James Clapper, the Director of National Intelligence under President Obama, denied that any evidence of such collusion existed while he oversaw the work of U.S. intelligence agencies. The Trump administration has also reiterated those denials. 

	But this Sunday on "Meet The Press," Schiff, D-Calif., told host Chuck Todd, "I was surprised to see Director Clapper say that because I don’t think you can make that claim categorically as he did. I would characterize it this way at the outset of the investigation: There is circumstantial evidence of collusion."


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843772976151642112
	James Clapper and others stated that there is no evidence Potus colluded with Russia. This story is FAKE NEWS and everyone knows it!
	3:35 AM - 20 Mar 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843776582825267201
	The Democrats made up and pushed the Russian story as an excuse for running a terrible campaign. Big advantage in Electoral College & lost!
	3:49 AM - 20 Mar 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843779892776964097
	The real story that Congress, the FBI and all others should be looking into is the leaking of Classified information. Must find leaker now!
	4:02 AM - 20 Mar 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/843813078076719107
	What about all of the contact with the Clinton campaign and the Russians? Also, is it true that the DNC would not let the FBI in to look?
	6:14 AM - 20 Mar 2017


http://www.bbc.com/news/world-us-canada-39324587
	Trump Russia claims: FBI's Comey confirms investigation of election 'interference'
	20 March 2017

	FBI director James Comey has confirmed for the first time that the FBI is investigating alleged Russian interference in the 2016 election.

	However, Mr Comey said his agency had seen no evidence to back up President Trump's claim that his phones had been tapped by the Obama administration.

	He was giving evidence to the congressional intelligence committee.

	The Trump administration said nothing had changed and there was "no evidence of Trump-Russia collusion".


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2017/03/20/fbi-bombshell-comey-trump-russia-investigation/99411214/
	Analysis: FBI bombshell creates 'a big gray cloud' over Trump's White House

	Published 3:48 p.m. ET March 20, 2017

	WASHINGTON — Not since Watergate.

	FBI Director James Comey delivered more than one bombshell at a rare public hearing of the House Intelligence Committee Monday. He said there was no evidence to back up President Trump's accusation that President Obama wiretapped Trump Tower during the 2016 campaign, joining congressional leaders and intelligence officials in discounting Trump's unsubstantiated claims.

	What was more explosive, though, was Comey's matter-of-fact confirmation that the FBI is investigating whether Trump associates colluded with Russia in the effort by one of the United States' leading global adversaries to affect the outcome of the 2016 presidential campaign.

	...The allegations “are more serious than anything we’ve seen in recent decades,” says political historian Matthew Dallek, a professor at George Washington University and author of Defenseless Under the Night: The Roosevelt Years and the Origins of Homeland Security. “That is far from a lone instance of an illegal leak or a president fudging the truth under oath about sex with a White House intern.”  While we obviously don’t know what evidence the FBI has assembled and whether anybody will ever be charged with a crime, the scope of the investigation appears to encompass at least several of Trump’s chief advisers and perhaps Trump himself."

	...it would not only be a serious crime,” California Rep. Adam Schiff, the ranking Democrat on the panel, said in his opening statement. “It would also represent one of the most shocking betrayals of our democracy in history.”

	After more than five hours of testimony, Intelligence Chairman Devin Nunes, R-Calif., closed the hearing with an almost anguished plea to Comey to finish the investigation as soon as possible. “The longer this hangs out here, the bigger the cloud is,” he said. “There is a big gray cloud that you have now put over people who have very important work to do to lead this country.”

	The White House dismissed the whole idea as preposterous.

	“James Clapper and others stated that there is no evidence Potus colluded with Russia,” Trump declared in the first of a string of early-morning tweets Monday on his personal Twitter account, @realDonaldTrump. “This story is FAKE NEWS and everyone knows it!”

	...There were signs that Trump was watching — and no signs that he was ready to temper his rhetoric.

	While Comey was testifying, there was a tweet on the official @POTUS Twitter account. “FBI Director Comey refuses to deny he briefed President Obama on calls made by Michael Flynn to Russia,” it said — suggesting that the former president himself was behind the leak. Another tweet declared, “The NSA and FBI tell Congress that Russia did not influence electoral process.”

	That wasn’t quite what they said, Comey and Rogers told the panel when the tweet was read to them, in what amounted to an awkward fact-checking exchange in real time with their boss. They said they hadn’t drawn conclusions on the impact of Moscow’s efforts.

	Comey did predict that Russia’s efforts to disrupt American elections weren’t over.

	“They’ll be back in 2020,” he warned. “They may be back in 2018. And one of the conclusions they may draw ... is they were successful.”


http://video.foxnews.com/v/5366444971001/?#sp=show-clips
	Russia cloud to continue to follow Trump

	Mar. 20, 2017 - 12:55 - It wasn't a good day for President Trump as FBI Director Comey confirmed a probe on possible collusion between Trump camp ad Russia in election and no evidence of wiretapping by Obama. 


https://newrepublic.com/minutes/141545/true-cnn-report-russia-destroy-trumps-presidency
	If true, this CNN report about Russia could destroy Trump’s presidency.

	“There is more than circumstantial evidence now” that the Trump campaign colluded with Russians, Schiff told MSNBC. 

	...It suggests that evidence of collusion between the Trump campaign and Russian officials may exist, something that Trump lackeys have been denying for months. And collusion is serious enough that it could bring down this administration.

	...At the very least, it’s hard not to see this leak as being retaliation for Nunes’s weird and unethical freelancing earlier in the day. Russia is, as Nunes put it, “a big gray cloud” over the administration. This report only makes that cloud bigger and grayer. 


https://twitter.com/mitchellvii/status/844707663187456000
	Donald J. Trump Retweeted
	Bill Mitchell Verified account @mitchellvii Mar 22

	EXACTLY AS I SAID - House Intel Chair: We Cannot Rule Out Sr. Obama Officials Were Involved in Trump Surveillance

	http://www.thegatewaypundit.com/2017/03/boom-house-intel-chair-cannot-rule-sr-obama-officials-involved-trump-surveillance/


https://twitter.com/mitchellvii/status/844689725755703296
	Donald J. Trump Retweeted
	Bill Mitchell Verified account @mitchellvii Mar 22

	Trump always ends up being right.  It's almost a little freaky.


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/325193-biden-on-trump-russia-relationship-what-in-the-hell-are-we
	Biden on Trump, Russia relationship: 'What in the hell are we doing?'

	03/22/17

	Former Vice President Joe Biden on Wednesday knocked the Trump administration for its relationship with Russia, criticizing Secretary of State Rex Tillerson's decision to visit Russia before a NATO meeting.

	"The notion that there's still this romance with Putin ... I'm told [Tillerson] has decided he's going to go visit Putin before he goes to the NATO conference? What in the hell are we doing?" Biden told reporters at the Capitol.

	On Monday, it was announced that Tillerson would not attend an April 5-6 meeting of NATO foreign ministers. He is instead staying in the U.S. for a visit by Chinese President Xi Jinping. Tillerson will then travel to Russia for a meeting with Russian President Vladimir Putin.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/23/politics/adam-schiff-trump-russia-grand-jury/index.html
	Schiff: New evidence shows possible Trump-Russia collusion

	Updated 9:41 PM ET, Thu March 23, 2017

	The top Democrat on the House Intelligence Committee is claiming that he has been presented with new information on collusion between associates of President Donald Trump and Russia, suggesting "it's the kind of evidence" that a grand jury investigation would want to consider.


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/325574-dem-rep-says-trump-administration-surrounded-by-cloud-of
	Dem rep: 'We must pause the entire Trump agenda' until Russia investigation complete
	By Nikita Vladimirov - 03/23/17 

		Cloud of treason means we must have total shutdown of any @POTUS agenda item. No votes on any item. My stmt https://t.co/stvzhHfMZ6 #GetWoke
    		— Ted Lieu (@tedlieu) March 23, 2017


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/03/chuck-grassley-rod-rosenstein-justice-nomination-236483
	Grassley relents on Rosenstein nomination

	03/24/2017 

	Senate Judiciary Committee Chairman Chuck Grassley (R-Iowa) is finally letting the nomination of a top Justice Department official advance, after refusing to schedule a vote because he had not received sufficient information on the ongoing Russia probe.

	The committee announced Friday that it will take up the nomination of Rod Rosenstein for deputy attorney general at its business meeting on Monday. Grassley had complained the administration was stonewalling his requests for more information, and earlier this month said he would not schedule a vote for Rosenstein until he was briefed by the FBI.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/03/chuck-grassley-donald-trump-dossier-236538
	Grassley requests information from firm behind Trump dossier

	03/27/2017

	Senate Judiciary Chairman Chuck Grassley is requesting information about the relationship between the FBI and the opposition research firm behind an unsubstantiated dossier whose contents included salacious allegations against President Donald Trump and his campaign aides.

	Grassley has sent a letter to the firm, Fusion GPS, asking for the firm to disclose who funded the dossier, which was compiled by a former British intelligence agent, and whether the company was in touch with the FBI or Justice Department about it.

	“When political opposition research becomes the basis for law enforcement or intelligence efforts, it raises substantial questions about the independence of law enforcement and intelligence from politics,” Grassley wrote in the letter.

	...The Washington Post reported that the FBI reached an agreement with the former British intelligence agent, Christopher Steele, to continue his research — though the deal reportedly never came to fruition.


https://www.grassley.senate.gov/sites/default/files/judiciary/upload/2017-03-28%20CEG%20to%20FBI%20%28McCabe%20Conflict%20in%20Trump%20Associates%20Investigation%29.pdf
	March 28, 2017

	Dear Director Comey: 

	...Pursuant to its authority under the Constitution and the Rules of the Senate, the Committee requires information to determine: (1) the extent to which FBI Deputy Director Andrew McCabe has been involved in the FBI’s investigation of President Trump’s associates and Russia; (2) whether that involvement raises the appearance a conflict of interest in light of his wife’s ties with Clinton associates; and (3) whether Mr. McCabe has been or should be recused from the investigation. 
 
	As you know, Mr. McCabe is under investigation by the Department of Justice Office of the 
Inspector General. ...examining whether the political and financial connections between his wife’s Democratic political campaign and Clinton associates warranted his recusal ...just five days after the New York Times broke the story about Secretary Clinton’s use of private email ...met with Virginia Governor Terry McAuliffe, a longtime, close associate of the Clintons ...McAuliffe recruited Dr. McCabe, who had not previously run for any political office, to be the Democratic candidate for ...subsequently gave nearly $500,000 to her campaign while the FBI’s investigation of Secretary Clinton was ongoing. ...also donated over $200,000 ...failed to recuse himself from the Clinton email investigation, despite the appearance of a conflict created by his wife’s campaign accepting $700,000 from a close Clinton associate during the investigation.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/trump-administration-sought-to-block-sally-yates-from-testifying-to-congress-on-russia/2017/03/28/82b73e18-13b4-11e7-9e4f-09aa75d3ec57_story.html
 	Trump administration sought to block Sally Yates from testifying to Congress on Russia

	By Devlin Barrett and Adam Entous March 28

	The Trump administration sought to block former acting attorney general Sally Yates from testifying in the House investigation of possible links between Russian officials and Donald Trump’s campaign, according to letters provided to The Washington Post.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/03/adam-schiff-sally-yates-michael-flynn-testimony-236585
	Schiff: Yates would have testified on Flynn ‘cover-up’

	03/28/2017 

	Rep. Adam Schiff, the top Democrat on the House Intelligence Committee, says a hearing set for Tuesday with former acting Attorney General Sally Yates — which was canceled by Republicans — would have featured explosive testimony on Michael Flynn’s efforts to "cover up" his conversations with Russia’s ambassador.

	The intelligence panel was scheduled to hold a public hearing with members of the Obama administration, including Yates, but Republicans nixed the session last week after the Trump administration raised concerns about Yates' possible testimony.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/28/politics/donald-trump-russia-presidency/index.html
	There's a Russian storm over Trump's struggling presidency

	By Stephen Collinson, CNN

	Tue March 28, 2017

	Washington (CNN)The darkening storm over Russia is now looming over President Donald Trump's innermost circle.

	The intrigue now threatening to swamp Washington politics deepened on Monday when Trump's son-in-law and trusted adviser, Jared Kushner, offered to testify to senators about meetings with senior Kremlin officials -- including the head of a bank closely linked to President Vladimir Putin's government.

	And more revelations about a secret trip to the White House complex by House Intelligence Chairman Devin Nunes spurred claims by Democrats that he was in league with the President's aides to subvert his own panel's investigation into Moscow's alleged election meddling and ties to the Trump campaign.

	It was all too much for the President. Perhaps prompted by rising speculation about Russia, Trump launched a Twitter barrage Monday night, possibly to distract attention from stories damaging to his White House by attacking a familiar target.

	"Why isn't the House Intelligence Committee looking into the Bill & Hillary deal that allowed big Uranium to go to Russia, Russian speech....money to Bill, the Hillary Russian 'reset,' praise of Russia by Hillary, or Podesta Russian Company. Trump Russia story is a hoax. #MAGA!" Trump wrote in a pair of tweets.

	...But the storm isn't likely to break soon: There will be new Russia-related headlines on Thursday, when an intelligence committee hearing offers senators their first chance to go on the record addressing the widening controversy embroiling Trump and Russia.

	...Political troubles

	...One Gallup tracking poll Monday put his approval ratings as low as 36% -- far lower than most presidents go across the span of the entire terms.

	..."It is just astonishing how little support there is for anything the President wants to do," said a senior Democratic official. "No matter what the President tries to do next, the public is going to be opposed to it."


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/847061031293779969
	If the people of our great country could only see how viciously and inaccurately my administration is covered by certain media!
	5:21 AM - 29 Mar 2017 


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/29/politics/james-comey-fbi/index.html
	Comey: I know when I'm going to cause a 'storm'

	Updated 5:25 AM ET, Thu March 30, 2017

	FBI Director James Comey said Wednesday his agency makes its decisions on a nonpartisan basis and said he doesn't care about the political backlash of the choices he makes.

	"I know that when I make a hard decision, a storm is going to follow," Comey said at the Intelligence and National Security Alliance Leadership dinner. "Honestly, I don't care."


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/847455180912181249
	The failing @nytimes has disgraced the media world. Gotten me wrong for two solid years. Change libel laws?
	
		The New York Times’ ongoing dishonesty only helps Trump...

	7:27 AM - 30 Mar 2017


http://nypost.com/2017/03/27/the-new-york-times-ongoing-dishonesty-only-helps-trump/amp/
	The New York Times’ ongoing dishonesty only helps Trump

	...As I’ve written before, back on Jan. 20 the Times carried a front-page story with the headline: “Wiretapped Data Used in Inquiry of Trump Aides.”

	...if that reporting was correct, the Times knew that some people associated with Trump were being wiretapped or — possibly — had been mentioned in wiretaps of foreign governments.

	...James Comey, the head of the FBI, recently denied Trump’s allegations in testimony before Congress, as did the head of the National Security Agency. Both are now expected to meet with Congress behind closed doors to see if they’d like to change their testimony.


https://www.wsj.com/articles/mike-flynn-offers-to-testify-in-exchange-for-immunity-1490912959
	Mike Flynn Offers to Testify in Exchange for Immunity

	Updated March 30, 2017 9:00 p.m. ET

	Mike Flynn, President Donald Trump’s former national security adviser, has told the Federal Bureau of Investigation and congressional officials investigating the Trump campaign’s potential ties to Russia that he is willing to be interviewed in exchange for a grant of immunity from prosecution, according to officials with knowledge of the matter.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	March 30 Phone Call

	On the morning of March 30, the President called me at the FBI. He described the Russia investigation as “a cloud” that was impairing his ability to act on behalf of the country. He said he had nothing to do with Russia, had not been involved with hookers in Russia, and had always assumed he was being recorded when in Russia. He asked what we could do to “lift the cloud.” I responded that we were investigating the matter as quickly as we could, and that there would be great benefit, if we didn’t find anything, to our having done the work well. He agreed, but then re-emphasized the problems this was causing him.

	Then the President asked why there had been a congressional hearing about Russia the previous week – at which I had, as the Department of Justice directed, confirmed the investigation into possible coordination between Russia and the Trump campaign. I explained the demands from the leadership of both parties in Congress for more information, and that Senator Grassley had even held up the confirmation of the Deputy Attorney General until we briefed him in detail on the investigation. I explained that we had briefed the leadership of Congress on exactly which individuals we were investigating and that we had told those Congressional leaders that we were not personally investigating President Trump. I reminded him I had previously told him that. He repeatedly told me, “We need to get that fact out.” (I did not tell the President that the FBI and the Department of Justice had been reluctant to make public statements that we did not have an open case on President Trump for a number of reasons, most importantly because it would create a duty to correct, should that change.)

	The President went on to say that if there were some “satellite” associates of his who did something wrong, it would be good to find that out, but that he hadn’t done anything wrong and hoped I would find a way to get it out that we weren’t investigating him.

	In an abrupt shift, he turned the conversation to FBI Deputy Director Andrew McCabe, saying he hadn’t brought up “the McCabe thing” because I had said McCabe was honorable, although McAuliffe was close to the Clintons and had given him (I think he meant Deputy Director McCabe’s wife) campaign money. Although I didn’t understand why the President was bringing this up, I repeated that Mr. McCabe was an honorable person.

	He finished by stressing “the cloud” that was interfering with his ability to make deals for the country and said he hoped I could find a way to get out that he wasn’t being investigated. I told him I would see what we could do, and that we would do our investigative work well and as quickly as we could.

	Immediately after that conversation, I called Acting Deputy Attorney General Dana Boente (AG Sessions had by then recused himself on all Russia-related matters), to report the substance of the call from the President, and said I would await his guidance. I did not hear back from him before the President called me again two weeks later.


http://gizmodo.com/this-is-almost-certainly-james-comey-s-twitter-account-1793843641
	This Is Almost Certainly James Comey’s Twitter Account

	Ashley Feinberg
	3/30/17 3:29pm

	There is only one person currently following the account: Benjamin Wittes of Lawfare. 

	...follows 27 other accounts, the majority of which are either reporters, news outlets, or official government and law enforcement accounts. The New York Times’ Adam Goldman and David Sanger and the Washington Post’s Ellen Nakashima and David Ignatius, all of whom have been aggressively covering the FBI investigation into Trump’s contacts with Russian agents, made the list, as did Wittes and former Bush Administration colleague Jack Goldsmith. Donald Trump is on there, too, but @projectexile7 seems to have begun following him relatively recently (its first follow was @nytimes).

	...And of the 39 total tweets the account has liked thus far eight refer directly to the FBI or James Comey himself

	...One deals with an active FBI investigation:

		Jared Kushner and Michael Flynn met with Russian envoy in December, White House says https://t.co/1rLCyNjxkM
		— The New York Times (@nytimes) March 2, 2017

	And four refer to the Trump administration in general:

		...#NotesFromUnderTrump, Day 25: The excellent Paul Gewirtz with a measured critique of the 9th Circuit. Very useful: https://t.co/rKpmpzsbHc

		...The hearing was titled, "Making EPA great again." Scientists are afraid the opposite will happen. https://t.co/wWiuWw4AdE

		...The "Who Wants to be a Secretary of State?" Edition - President-Elect Trump is zeroing in on a nominee for... https://t.co/5UbT8ccrqY

		...Donald Trump is assembling the richest administration in modern American history https://t.co/tpT6UnV3Dy


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/847766558520856578
	Mike Flynn should ask for immunity in that this is a witch hunt (excuse for big election loss), by media & Dems, of historic proportion!
	4:04 AM - 31 Mar 2017 


http://www.foxnews.com/politics/2017/03/31/intelligence-official-who-unmasked-trump-associates-is-very-high-up-source-says.html
	Intelligence official who 'unmasked' Trump associates is 'very high up,' source says

	By Malia Zimmerman, Adam Housley Published March 31, 2017

	The U.S. intelligence official who “unmasked,” or exposed, the names of multiple private citizens affiliated with the Trump team is someone “very well known, very high up, very senior in the intelligence world,” a source told Fox News on Friday. 

	Intelligence and House sources with direct knowledge of the disclosure of classified names told Fox News that House Intelligence Committee Chairman Devin Nunes, R-Calif., now knows who is responsible -- and that person is not in the FBI.

	...“The main issue in this case, is not only the unmasking of these names of private citizens, but the spreading of these names for political purposes that have nothing to do with national security or an investigation into Russia’s interference in the U.S. election,” a congressional source close to the investigation told Fox News. 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/848216035153121285
	Wow, @FoxNews just reporting big news. Source: "Official behind unmasking is high up. Known Intel official is responsible. Some unmasked....
	9:50 AM - 1 Apr 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/848219027659010051
	..not associated with Russia. Trump team spied on before he was nominated." If this is true, does not get much bigger. Would be sad for U.S.
	10:02 AM - 1 Apr 2017


Comey reveals that Trump's associates are under a counterintelligence investigation for ties to Russia while Trump rants about it on twitter. That and subsequent revelations are said to put a "big gray cloud" over the Trump administration. Trump continues to insist Obama spied on him. Meanwhile, Trump's associates are stiffing NATO and blocking Sally Yate's testimony on Flynn. Biden wonders "what the hell are we doing." Schiff insists there is evidence of cover-ups and collusion, Grassley raises a stink about FBI connections with the "dirty dossier," and Comey mentions that he "knows when he's going to cause a storm" but he "doesn't care." Flynn tells Russia investigators he will testify in exchange for immunity. Trump complains that the media treats him unfairly.

It is around this time that Trump calls up Comey to complain about the Russia investigation, calling it a "cloud" over his administration and reiterating that he wasn't involved with hookers in Russia. Trump asks Comey if there is anything the FBI could do to "lift the cloud." Trump agrees the FBI should do a good job, but reemphasizes that "the cloud" is causing him problems and complicating his efforts to "make deals" for the country.

Reading between the lines of Comey's statement, it looks like Trump asks Comey why he publicly confirmed the counterintelligence investigation into his associates, and Comey tells him that Congress wanted it. Trump repeatedly tells Comey "we need get it out" that he is not under investigation, and says it would be good to clear the names of his associates if they haven't done anything wrong.

In an apparent attempt to bargain, Trump points out to Comey that he hadn't mentioned "the McCabe thing" (that McCabe had the appearance of a conflict of interest regarding donations from Clinton associates) since Comey said McMabe is "honorable." Comey repeats that McCabe is "honorable" and Trump reiterates that the "cloud" is hurting his dealmaking and he wants the public to know he's not under investigation. After the meeting, a journalist claims to have found Comey's twitter account, which is following several high-profile journalists who have been reporting on the Russia story in the Washington Post and New York Times.

Trump continues to tweet that the Russia investigation is made up and that Obama intelligence officials are out to get him.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/04/05/politics/trump-associates-russians-meetings/index.html
	One week, three more Trump-Russia connections
	Updated 6:36 AM ET, Thu April 6, 2017 

	In December, Donald Trump's son-in-law and close adviser met privately with the head of a Russian bank under U.S. sanctions.

	In January, a major Trump donor with ties to his administration flew to a remote island and conferred with a confidant of Russian President Vladimir Putin.
And four years ago, a Trump adviser interacted with a Russian spy trying to elicit intelligence.

	Three revelations in the past week have raised new questions from lawmakers about the Trump team's relations with Russian leaders and broadened Congress's inquiries into whether Trump associates colluded with Russia in its effort to sway the 2016 presidential election.


http://www.cnbc.com/2017/04/06/the-us-warned-the-russians-ahead-of-syria-missile-strikes-official.html
	The US warned the Russians ahead of Syria missile strikes

 	Friday, 7 Apr 2017 | 1:38 AM ET

	A U.S. official said the Russians had been warned before the U.S. launched at least 59 tomahawk missiles aimed at Syria.

	Pentagon spokesman Captain Jeff Davis said in an official statement: "Russian forces were notified in advance of the strike using the established deconfliction line. U.S. military planners took precautions to minimize risk to Russian or Syrian personnel located at the airfield."

	The strikes, which hit an airfield near Homs, struck aircraft and infrastructure including the runway, NBC reported. There is no word on casualties yet, but no people were targeted, the official told NBC.


https://www.whitehouse.gov/the-press-office/2017/04/06/statement-president-trump-syria
	Statement by President Trump on Syria

	April 06, 2017

	THE PRESIDENT:  My fellow Americans:  On Tuesday, Syrian dictator Bashar al-Assad launched a horrible chemical weapons attack on innocent civilians.  Using a deadly nerve agent, Assad choked out the lives of helpless men, women, and children.  It was a slow and brutal death for so many.  Even beautiful babies were cruelly murdered in this very barbaric attack.  No child of God should ever suffer such horror.

	Tonight, I ordered a targeted military strike on the airfield in Syria from where the chemical attack was launched.  It is in this vital national security interest of the United States to prevent and deter the spread and use of deadly chemical weapons.  There can be no dispute that Syria used banned chemical weapons, violated its obligations under the Chemical Weapons Convention, and ignored the urging of the U.N. Security Council.  

	Years of previous attempts at changing Assad's behavior have all failed, and failed very dramatically.  As a result, the refugee crisis continues to deepen and the region continues to destabilize, threatening the United States and its allies.  

	Tonight, I call on all civilized nations to join us in seeking to end the slaughter and bloodshed in Syria, and also to end terrorism of all kinds and all types.  We ask for God's wisdom as we face the challenge of our very troubled world.  We pray for the lives of the wounded and for the souls of those who have passed.  And we hope that as long as America stands for justice, then peace and harmony will, in the end, prevail.  

	Goodnight.  And God bless America and the entire world.  Thank you.

	END


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-mideast-crisis-syria-idUSKBN1782S0
	Sat Apr 8, 2017 | 9:06am EDT
	Russia warns of serious consequences from U.S. strike in Syria

	Russia warned on Friday that U.S. cruise missile strikes on a Syrian air base could have "extremely serious" consequences, as President Donald Trump's first major foray into a foreign conflict opened up a rift between Moscow and Washington.


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/first-read/trump-s-white-house-offers-mixed-messages-syria-n744556
	Team Trump Offers Mixed Messages on Syria

	- U.S. Ambassador Nikki Haley on Meet the Press: "In no way do we see peace in that area with Assad as the head of the Syrian government. And we have to make sure that we're pushing that process. The political solution has to come together for the good of the people of Syria.”

	- Haley on CNN: “Regime change is something that we think is going to happen because all of the parties are going to see that Assad is not the leader that needs to be taking place for Syria.”

	- Tillerson on CBS: “[W]e believe that the first priority is the defeat of ISIS, that, by defeating ISIS and removing their caliphate from their control, we have now eliminated at least or minimized a particular threat, not just the United States, but to the whole stability in the region. And once the ISIS threat has been reduced or eliminated, I think we can turn our attention directly to stabilizing the situation in Syria."

	- National Security Adviser H.R. McMaster on FOX: “[W]hat Ambassador Haley pointed out is it's very difficult to understand how a political solution could result from the continuation of the Assad regime. Now, we are not saying that we are the ones who are going to affect that change. What we are saying is, other countries have to ask themselves some hard questions. Russia should ask themselves, what are we doing here?”

	...The waters are muddy here, and it’s complicating the way forward for an administration that hoped to take advantage of a show of decisiveness last week...


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2017/05/01/syrian-missile-attack-after-dinner-entertainment-commerce-secretary-wilbur-ross-says/101175242/
	Syrian missile attack was 'after-dinner entertainment,' Commerce Secretary Wilbur Ross says

	Commerce Secretary Wilbur Ross likened the U.S. attack on a Syrian airbase to "after-dinner entertainment" for those who were at Mar-a-Lago that week, according to a new report.

	The way Ross describes it, on April 6, in the middle of President Trump's summit with Chinese President Xi Jinping, "just as dessert was being served, the president explained to Mr. Xi he had something he wanted to tell him, which was the launching of 59 missiles into Syria. It was in lieu of after-dinner entertainment."


http://www.cnn.com/2017/04/12/politics/donald-trump-xi-jingping-syria-chocolate-cake/index.html
	Trump, Xi talked Syria strike over 'beautiful' chocolate cake

	President Donald Trump, in an interview with Fox Business, said he informed Chinese President Xi Jinping about the air strikes he authorized in Syria over the "most beautiful piece of chocolate cake that you've ever seen" at his ocean-side club and that the communist leader was "enjoying it."

	"I was sitting at the table. We had finished dinner. We're now having dessert. And we had the most beautiful piece of chocolate cake that you've ever seen and President Xi was enjoying it," Trump said, before telling interviewer Maria Bartiromo he was told the strike was ready to go.

	Trump added that he told Xi that the United States had "just fired 59 missiles ... heading to Iraq," incorrectly identifying the country he was striking when relaying the story to Bartiromo.

	Of Xi, Trump said, "And he was eating his cake. And he was silent."

	
http://www.cbsnews.com/news/what-happened-to-russias-agreement-to-eliminate-syrias-chemical-weapons/
	What happened to Russia's agreement to eradicate Syria’s chemical weapons?

	April 10, 2017, 6:00 AM


https://apnews.com/19772be1238e49fbb62c509a5b659b3d/official-us-military-takes-extra-precautions-syria
	Official: Russia knew Syrian chemical attack was coming

	...The allegation of Russian foreknowledge is grave, even by the standards of the currently dismal U.S.-Russian relations.


http://thehill.com/policy/international/middle-east-north-africa/328165-us-determines-russia-knew-of-chemical-weapons
	WH disputes report Russia knew of chemical attack in Syria beforehand
	By Mallory Shelbourne - 04/10/17 04:26 PM EDT 

	The Associated Press reported Monday that the United States determined that Russia knew about last week’s chemical attack on a town in Syria beforehand.

	But in a Monday evening statement, a senior administration official disputed that report. 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/11/opinion/is-russia-testing-trump.html
	Is Russia Testing Trump?

	By MICHAEL J. MORELL and EVELYN FARKASAPRIL 11, 2017

	This week Secretary of State Rex Tillerson is making his first diplomatic visit to Russia, where he’s likely to press Moscow on its handling of Syria, which he has called “incompetent.”

	But Mr. Tillerson should recognize that Russia’s involvement in Syria is only one example of the increasingly active, and disruptive, role that President Vladimir Putin has been playing on the world stage since Donald Trump’s inauguration.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/read-james-comeys-prepared-statement-thursdays-senate-hearing/
	April 11 Phone Call

	On the morning of April 11, the President called me and asked what I had done about his request that I “get out” that he is not personally under investigation. I replied that I had passed his request to the Acting Deputy Attorney General, but I had not heard back. He replied that “the cloud” was getting in the way of his ability to do his job. He said that perhaps he would have his people reach out to the Acting Deputy Attorney General. I said that was the way his request should be handled. I said the White House Counsel should contact the leadership of DOJ to make the request, which was the traditional channel.

	He said he would do that and added, “Because I have been very loyal to you, very loyal; we had that thing you know.” I did not reply or ask him what he meant by “that thing.” I said only that the way to handle it was to have the White House Counsel call the Acting Deputy Attorney General. He said that was what he would do and the call ended.

	That was the last time I spoke with President Trump.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170412000123/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-obtained-fisa-warrant-to-monitor-former-trump-adviser-carter-page/2017/04/11/620192ea-1e0e-11e7-ad74-3a742a6e93a7_story.html
	FBI obtained FISA warrant to monitor former Trump adviser Carter Page
	By Ellen Nakashima, Devlin Barrett and Adam Entous
 	April 11 at 7:11 PM

	The FBI obtained a secret court order last summer to monitor the communications of an adviser to presidential candidate Donald Trump, part of an investigation into possible links between Russia and the campaign, law enforcement and other U.S. officials said.

	The FBI and the Justice Department obtained the warrant targeting Carter Page’s communications after convincing a Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Court judge that there was probable cause to believe Page was acting as an agent of a foreign power, in this case Russia, according to the officials. 

	...Applications for FISA warrants, Comey said, are often thicker than his wrists, and that thickness represents all the work Justice Department attorneys and FBI agents have to do to convince a judge that such surveillance is appropriate in an investigation. 


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/328590-trump-reinforces-turnaround-on-syria-and-russia
	Trump reinforces turnaround on Syria and Russia
	04/12/17

	Asked if he thought Russia knew of the sarin nerve gas attack that the U.S. and its allies have pinned on Syrian President Bashar Assad, whose government has been facing armed opposition in a yearslong civil war, Trump hedged.

	“I think it's certainly possible. I think it's probably unlikely,” he said. “I would like to think that they didn't know, but certainly they could have.”

	...Trump has been signaling a more aggressive and antagonistic approach to Syria and Russia, Assad’s primary backer, since the chemical attack — moving away from his campaign promises to forge better ties with Moscow and to avoid U.S. military interventions in the Middle East. 


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-russia-tillerson-putin-idUSKBN17E11W
	Wed Apr 12, 2017

	Putin says U.S.-Russia ties worse since Trump took office

	Levels of trust between Moscow and Washington have deteriorated since U.S. President Donald Trump took office, Russian President Vladimir Putin said in an interview broadcast on Wednesday.

	Asked about relations since Trump became president, Putin said, according to a transcript of the interview released by the Kremlin: "One could say that the level of trust on a working level, especially on the military level, has not improved, but rather has deteriorated."

	Asked about accusations that Syria's government launched a chemical weapons attack in Idlib province, Putin said that Damascus had given up its chemical weapons stocks.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/852510810287075329
	Things will work out fine between the U.S.A. and Russia. At the right time everyone will come to their senses & there will be lasting peace!
	6:16 AM - 13 Apr 2017 


After bungling his response to the Syrian chemical attacks, Trump calls up Comey again to ask him about "getting it out" that he is not under investigation. Reading between the lines, this might be what Trump thinks is "the cloud" that is "getting in the way of doing his job." It is unclear if this call is related to the Syria strikes, but that seems to be the biggest Russia-related event leading-up to the call.

Comey tells Trump to reach out to Boente instead. In another apparent attempt to bargain, Trump reminds Comey that he has been "loyal" to him and that "we had that thing you know." Comey reiterates that Trump should bring his request to DOJ leadership, and that was the last time Comey talked to Trump.

Trump continues his weak foreign policy and quiet submission to Putin.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/02/trump-clinton-comey-best-thing-that-ever-happened-237911
	Trump jabs back at Clinton: Comey was 'best thing that ever happened' to her

	05/02/2017 

	President Trump woke up Tuesday fuming at Democrats and calling for a shutdown of the federal government later this year. He went to bed Tuesday fuming at Hillary Clinton and accusing James Comey, his FBI director, of taking it easy on her -- in another extraordinary 140-character post for the commander-in-chief.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859601184285491201
	FBI Director Comey was the best thing that ever happened to Hillary Clinton in that he gave her a free pass for many bad deeds! The phony...
	7:51 PM - 2 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/859604996236742656
	...Trump/Russia story was an excuse used by the Democrats as justification for losing the election. Perhaps Trump just ran a great campaign?
	8:06 PM - 2 May 2017


http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/02/politics/lindsey-graham-susan-rice-senate-hearing/index.html
	Lindsey Graham calls on Susan Rice to testify at hearing

	May 2, 2017

	Graham, the chairman of a judiciary subcommittee, told CNN he has asked Rice to testify at the same hearing where former deputy Attorney General Sally Yates and former Director of National Intelligence James Clapper will testify on Russia meddling. It is unclear if Rice will appear.
CNN has reached out to Rice for comment and has not yet received a response. Over the weekend, Rice denied the unmasking allegation to CNN's Fareed Zakaria.

	"I did my job, which was to protect the American people, and I did it faithfully and to the best of my ability," she said. "And never did I do anything that was untoward with respect to the intelligence I received."

	The call from Graham shows the lingering concern among Republicans that Rice may have acted improperly in seeking to learn the identities of Trump officials discussing matters with foreign officials related to the Trump transition.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/860081707315232771
	Susan Rice, the former National Security Advisor to President Obama, is refusing to testify before a Senate Subcommittee next week on.....
	3:40 AM - 4 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/860083874893897728
	...allegations of unmasking Trump transition officials. Not good!
	3:49 AM - 4 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861550676505219073
	General Flynn was given the highest security clearance by the Obama Administration - but the Fake News seldom likes talking about that.
	4:57 AM - 8 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861592420043157504
	Ask Sally Yates, under oath, if she knows how classified information got into the newspapers soon after she explained it to W.H. Counsel.
	7:43 AM - 8 May 2017 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	WHITEHOUSE: You could perhaps have waited until you actually had seen the agents 302 from the interview of General Flynn. Why go ahead of that? Why not wait?

	YATES: Well, because this was a matter of some urgency, we...

	WHITEHOUSE: Describe.

	YATES: In making the determination about notification here, we had to balance a variety of interest. For the reasons that I just described a few minutes ago, we felt like it was critical that we get this information to the White House, because in part because the vice president was unknowingly making false statements to the public and because we believed that General Flynn was compromised with respect to the Russians.

	...YATES: ...And, in fact, Mr. McGahn responded back to me to let me know that anything that General Flynn would've said would have been based -- excuse me -- anything that Vice President Pence would have said would have been based on what General Flynn had told him.

	YATES: ...one of the questions that Mr. McGahn asked me when I went back over the second day was essentially, why does it matter to DOJ if one White House official lies to another White House official?

	And so we explained to him, it was a whole lot more than that and went back over the same concerns that we had raised with them the prior day, that the concern first about the underlying conduct itself, that he had lied to the vice president and others, the American public had been misled.

	YATES ...and in fact, I remember specifically saying, you know it wouldn't really be fair of us to tell you this and then expect you to sit on your hands.

	...KLOBUCHAR: ...And one of the White House officials has described the notification that you provided warning them of this as a heads up. How would you describe a heads-up?

	YATES: Well at the risk of trying to characterize. I mean we were there to tell the White House about something we were very concerned about and emphasized to them repeatedly. It was so they could take action.

	...DURBIN: On February 14th, after General Flynn resigned, Sean Spicer said, and I quote, "There was nothing in what General Flynn did in terms of conducting himself that was an issue." Do you have any idea what he meant by those words?

	YATES: No. I'm not -- all I can say is he didn't reach that conclusion from his conversation with us. I can't speak to how he arrived at that.

	...KLOBUCHAR: And during that meeting did they mention -- anyone mention that this refugee order was about to come out?

	YATES: No.

	KLOBUCHAR: Did the acting Attorney General of the United States?

	YATES: No and that was one thing that was of concern to us, is that not only was department leadership not consulted here and beyond department leadership, really the subject matter experts, the national security experts, not only was the department not consulted, we weren't even told about it. I learned about this from media reports.

	KLOBUCHAR: So you learned about it after the meeting at the White house Council from the media.

	YATES: Right.

	KLOBUCHAR: And then it's true that during your hearing, then Senator Sessions, now the Attorney General actually asked you if the views the President wants to execute are unlawful, should the Attorney General or Deputy Attorney General say no? And what did you say?

	YATES: And I said yes, the Attorney General should.

	...YATES: Well, certainly, in the course of the meetings, both on the 26th and 27th, Mr. McGahn certainly demonstrated that he understood that this was serious. So he did seem to be taking it seriously.

	I -- you know, I don't have any way of knowing what, if anything, they did. If nothing was done, then certainly, that would be concerning.

	...Had I remained at the Department of Justice, and if I were under the impression that nothing had been done, then, yes, I would have raised it again with the White House.

	...WHITEHOUSE: And that was the end of this episode, nobody came over to look at the material?

	YATES: I don't know what happened after that because that was my last day with DOJ.

	...YATES: I think they're coming back, and we have to do a whole lot more, both to harden our election systems, our state election systems, to ensure that folks out there know when they're looking at news feeds, that it may not be real news that they're reading.

	I think that we have to do more to deter the Russians, and it wouldn't hurt to prosecute a few folks...


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861713233786404864
	Sally Yates made the fake media extremely unhappy today --- she said nothing but old news!
	3:43 PM - 8 May 2017 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/08/full-transcript-sally-yates-and-james-clapper-testify-on-russian-election-interference/
	GRAHAM: Without objection. General Clapper, on March 5, 2017, you said the following to a question. Here's the question.

	Does intelligence exist that can definitely answer the following question, whether there were improper contacts between the Trump campaign and Russian officials? You said we did not include any evidence in our report.

	And I say our, that's the NSA, the FBI, the CIA, with my office, the Director of National Intelligence, that had anything — that had any reflection of collusion between members of the Trump campaign and the Russians. There was no evidence of that included in our report.

	Chuck Todd (ph) then asked, I understand that, but does it exist? You say no, not to my knowledge. Is that still accurate?

	CLAPPER: It is.

	GRAHAM: Ms. Yates, do you have any evidence — are you aware of any evidence that would suggest that in the 2016 campaign anybody in the Trump campaign colluded — colluded with the Russian government intelligence services in improper fashion?

	YATES: And Senator, my answer to that question would require me to reveal classified information. And so, I — I can't answer that.

	GRAHAM: Well, I don't get that because he just said he issued the report. And he said he doesn't know of any. So, what would you know that's not in the report? ...

	YATES: Well, I think that Director Clapper also said that he was unaware of the FBI counter intelligence investigations.

	GRAHAM: Would it be fair to say that the counter-intelligence investigation was not mature enough to come to his — to get in the report. Is that fair, Mr. — Mr. Clapper?

	CLAPPER: I — that's an — that's a possibility.

	...FEINSTEIN: The Guardian has reported that Britain's intelligence service first became aware in late 2015 of suspicious interactions between Trump advisers and Russian intelligence agents. This information was passed on to U.S. intelligence agencies.

	Over the spring of 2016, multiple European allies passed on additional information to the United States about contacts between the Trump campaign and Russians. Is this accurate?

	YATES: I -- I can't answer that.

	FEINSTEIN: General Clapper, is that accurate?

	CLAPPER: Yes, it is and it's also quite sensitive.

	FEINSTEIN: OK. Let me ask you this.

	CLAPPER: The specifics are -- are --- are quite sensitive.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861712617299210240
	Director Clapper reiterated what everybody, including the fake media already knows- there is "no evidence" of collusion w/ Russia and Trump.
	3:41 PM - 8 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/861713823505494016
	The Russia-Trump collusion story is a total hoax, when will this taxpayer funded charade end?
	3:46 PM - 8 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/861715019674910721
	Biggest story today between Clapper & Yates is on surveillance. Why doesn't the media report on this? #FakeNews!
	3:50 PM - 8 May 2017 


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/18/rod-rosenstein-james-coming-senators-briefing-238562
	Senators: Rosenstein knew Comey would be fired before writing memo

	Rod Rosenstein already knew James Comey was going to be fired as FBI director when he wrote the three-page memo that the White House would later assert had sealed Comey’s fate, multiple senators said Thursday as they left a highly-anticipated briefing with the deputy attorney general.

	Rosenstein learned Comey was being ousted on May 8, according to Senate Minority Whip Dick Durbin (D-Ill.), but the memo is dated May 9 — the day the firing took place.


https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2017/05/rosenstein-letter-annotated/526116/
	May 9, 2017

	MEMORANDUM FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

	FROM: ROD J. ROSENSTEIN

	DEPUTY ATTORNEY GENERAL

	SUBJECT: RESTORING PUBLIC CONFIDENCE IN THE FBI

	...As you and I have discussed, however, I cannot defend the Director's handling of the conclusion of the investigation of Secretary Clinton's emails, and I do not understand his refusal to accept the nearly universal judgment that he was mistaken. Almost everyone agrees that the Director made serious mistakes; it is one of the few issues that unites people of diverse perspectives.

	The director was wrong to usurp the Attorney General's authority on July 5, 2016, and announce his conclusion that the case should be closed without prosecution.

	...There is a well-established process for other officials to step in when a conflict requires the recusal of the Attorney General. On July 5, however, the Director announced his own conclusions about the nation's most sensitive criminal investigation, without the authorization of duly appointed Justice Department leaders.

	Compounding the error, the Director ignored another longstanding principle: we do not hold press conferences to release derogatory information about the subject of a declined criminal investigation. Derogatory information sometimes is disclosed in the course of criminal investigations and prosecutions, but we never release it gratuitously. The Director laid out his version of the facts for the news media as if it were a closing argument, but without a trial. It is a textbook example of what federal prosecutors and agents are taught not to do.

	...Concerning his letter to the Congress on October 28, 2016, the Director cast his decision as a choice between whether he would "speak" about the decision to investigate the newly-discovered email messages or "conceal" it. "Conceal" is a loaded term that misstates the issue. When federal agents and prosecutors quietly open a criminal investigation, we are not concealing anything; we are simply following the longstanding policy that we refrain from publicizing non-public information. In that context, silence is not concealment.

	...Although the President has the power to remove an FBI director, the decision should not be taken lightly. I agree with the nearly unanimous opinions of former Department officials. The way the Director handled the conclusion of the email investigation was wrong. As a result, the FBI is unlikely to regain public and congressional trust until it has a Director who understands the gravity of the mistakes and pledges never to repeat them. Having refused to admit his errors, the Director cannot be expected to implement the necessary corrective actions.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/09/us/politics/james-comey-fired-fbi.html
	F.B.I. Director James Comey is Fired by Trump
	May 9, 2017


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2017/05/09/full-text-trump-letter-comey-firing/101491982/
	Dear Director Comey:

	I have received the attached letters from the Attorney General and Deputy Attorney General of the United States recommending your dismissal as the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. I have accepted their recommendation and you are hereby terminated and removed from office, effective immediately.

	While I greatly appreciate you informing me, on three separate occasions, that I am not under investigation, I nevertheless concur with the judgement of the Department of Justice that you are not able to effectively lead the Bureau.

	It is essential that we find new leadership for the FBI that restores public trust and confidence in its vital law enforcement mission.

	I wish you the best of luck in your future endeavors.

	Donald J. Trump


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/18/rod-rosenstein-james-coming-senators-briefing-238562
	Senators: Rosenstein knew Comey would be fired before writing memo

	Rod Rosenstein already knew James Comey was going to be fired as FBI director when he wrote the three-page memo that the White House would later assert had sealed Comey’s fate, multiple senators said Thursday as they left a highly-anticipated briefing with the deputy attorney general.

	Rosenstein learned Comey was being ousted on May 8, according to Senate Minority Whip Dick Durbin (D-Ill.), but the memo is dated May 9 — the day the firing took place.

	...“Director Comey was very unpopular with most people. I actually thought when I made that decision — and I also got a very strong recommendation, as you know, from the deputy attorney general, Rod Rosenstein,” Trump said. “He had the very poor performance [before Congress]. … I believe that’s why the deputy attorney general went out and wrote his very, very strong letter.”


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	HOLT: Monday you met with the Deputy Attorney General Rod Rosenstein.

	TRUMP: Right.

	HOLT: Did you ask for a recommendation?

	TRUMP: What I did is I was going to fire Comey. My decision. It was not...

	HOLT: You had made the decision before they came into your office (ph).

	TRUMP: I -- I was going to fire Comey. I -- there's no good time to do it, by the way.

	They...

	HOLT: Because in your letter, you said...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: They -- they were...

	HOLT: ...I -- I accepted -- accepted their recommendations.

	TRUMP: Yeah, well, they also...



https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/862135824745467905
	Cryin' Chuck Schumer stated recently, "I do not have confidence in him (James Comey) any longer." Then acts so indignant.  #draintheswamp
	7:42 PM - 9 May 2017


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/332676-trump-dings-cryin-chuck-schumer-for-bashing-comey-firing
	Trump dings ‘Cryin’ Chuck Schumer’ for bashing Comey firing


	At a press conference earlier Tuesday evening, Schumer said he told Trump that his decision to fire Comey was a "big mistake."

	"Earlier this afternoon President Trump called me and informed me he was firing Director Comey," Schumer told reporters. "I told the president, 'Mr. President, with all due respect, you are making a big mistake.’ ”

	He added that Trump didn't "really respond" to his comment.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/10/as-trump-fired-comey-his-staff-scrambled-to-explain-why/
 	After Trump fired Comey, White House staff scrambled to explain why
	May 10

	...After Spicer spent several minutes hidden in the darkness and among the bushes near these sets, Janet Montesi, an executive assistant in the press office, emerged and told reporters that Spicer would answer some questions, as long as he was not filmed doing so...


https://www.whitehouse.gov/the-press-office/2017/05/10/readout-president-donald-j-trumps-meeting-foreign-minister-sergey-lavrov
	May 10, 2017
	Readout of President Donald J. Trump’s Meeting with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov of Russia

	President Donald J. Trump met today with Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov of Russia, following on the visit of Secretary of State Rex Tillerson to Moscow last month. President Trump emphasized the need to work together to end the conflict in Syria, in particular, underscoring the need for Russia to rein in the Assad regime, Iran, and Iranian proxies. The President raised Ukraine, and expressed his Administration’s commitment to remain engaged in resolving the conflict and stressed Russia’s responsibility to fully implement the Minsk agreements.  He also raised the possibility of broader cooperation on resolving conflicts in the Middle East and elsewhere. The President further emphasized his desire to build a better relationship between the United States and Russia.


http://ktla.com/2017/05/10/trump-describes-meeting-with-russias-foreign-minister-ambassador-as-very-very-good/
	Trump Describes Meeting With Russia’s Foreign Minister, Ambassador as ‘Very, Very Good’

	Posted 10:52 AM, May 10, 2017

	President Donald Trump hosted Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov and Russian Ambassador to the US Sergey Kislyak at the White House Wednesday amid the swirling investigation of Russian contacts with Trump campaign and transition officials in 2016 and Tuesday’s firing of FBI Director James Comey, who was handling the probe.

	...The Russian Embassy tweeted a photo of Trump shaking the hand of Russia’s ambassador in what appears to be the Oval Office. Current and former US intelligence officials have accused Kislyak of being a top spy and recruiter of spies, a notion that Russian officials have dismissed.

	A White House statement after the meeting omitted any mention of Kislyak’s presence, instead focusing on Trump’s conversation with Lavrov, which the President described as “very, very good.”

	...According to the statement, Trump emphasized the need for the US and Russia to work together to end violence in Syria and Ukraine, floated the prospect of US-Russia cooperation on resolving Middle East conflicts and returned to a campaign theme by emphasizing his desire for better relations with Moscow.

	Lavrov denies election meddling

	Lavrov, who started off a news conference at the Russian Embassy by remarking that “relations between our countries … are not in the best condition,” also fielded several questions about Russia’s alleged meddling in the 2016 race to obvious irritation. “There is not a single fact (or) compelling evidence regarding Russia’s intervention,” he said.

	At another point, he mocked the idea, saying it must be “humiliating for the American people to realize the Russian Federation is controlling the situation in the United States.”

	...Alleged ties to Russia

	Former Acting Attorney General Sally Yates said Monday that she alerted the White House earlier this year that then-Trump national security adviser Michael Flynn could be “essentially blackmailed by the Russians.”

	Her testimony pushed the story of the Trump campaign’s alleged ties to Russia back into the headlines.

	In an interview last week, Trump once again refused to blame Russia for attempting to influence the 2016 election through hacking and other means, despite an overwhelming consensus by US law enforcement and intelligence agencies.

	Trump and Putin also spoke by phone last week about the war in Syria for the first time since Trump ordered a missile strike against a Syrian government air base last month after an alleged chemical weapons attack by the Syrian regime.

	The US missile strike angered Moscow and led Lavrov to declare that “it’s sad how damaging this is to the already bad relations between US and Russia.”

	...In 2009, under then-President Barack Obama, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton famously presented Lavrov with a “reset” button to symbolically restart US-Russia relations. Unfortunately, instead of “reset” the Russian word on the button read “overcharged.”

	Diplomatically, Lavrov said he would keep the button on his desk. The attempt at a reset didn’t work


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/2017/05/11/russians-fail-disclose-its-official-photographer-works-tass-news-agency/101543498/
	Kremlin outfoxes White House over photos of Trump meeting with Russians

	...The widespread distribution of the Russian photos was a public relations coup for the Russians, who have been trying for several years to secure an Oval Office meeting for its foreign minister as a counterpoint to the strained relations between the two countries. Normally, such White House meetings are reserved for heads of state.

	Because of strained relations, it was Lavrov's first visit to the White House since 2013, despite lobbying efforts by the Russians, according to Politico, which reported that Trump agreed to receive him in the Oval Office at the request of Russian President Vladimir Putin.

	The issue is particularly sensitive because of the presence at the meeting of Kislyak, who has been at the center of several controversies involving administration officials, including now fired National Security Adviser Michael Flynn and Attorney General Jeff Sessions. The Russian embassy even tweeted a photograph of Trump smiling broadly as he put his arm around the diplomat while shaking his hand in the Oval Office.


http://www.pbs.org/newshour/rundown/watch-kissinger-side-trump-delivers-first-person-response-comey-firing/
	May 10, 2017

	The same day President Donald Trump was meeting with Russia’s foreign minister at the White House — and less than a day after firing former FBI director James Comey — the press pool captured Trump posing in the Oval Office with Henry Kissinger.

	According to the pool report, journalists had expected to find Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov at the president’s side, but instead was invited to an unannounced meeting with Kissinger, who served as secretary of state under Richard Nixon.

	Trump said he had met with Kissinger to talk “about Russia and various other matters.”

	...Trump added that Kissinger has “been a friend of mine for a long time.” Shortly after winning the 2016 presidential election, Trump met Kissinger in New York to discuss “events and issues around the world.”

	The press had not been permitted to witness the meeting with Lavrov, which was documented in handout photos provided by the Russian government.

	A CBS reporter caught Russian President Vladimir Putin at a hockey game in Sochi to ask for his reaction and whether Tuesday’s firing would affect the relationship between the two countries.

	“There will be no effect,” Putin said, with a translator at his side. “Your question looks very funny for me. Don’t be angry with me. We have nothing to do with that.”

	“President Trump is acting in accordance with his competence, in accordance with his law and Constitution,” he added. 


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/334272-trump-told-russians-firing-nut-job-comey-eased-pressure-on-him-report
	Trump told Russians firing 'nut job' Comey eased pressure

	President Trump called former FBI chief James Comey a "nut job" during an Oval Office meeting with two Russian officials, telling them his firing relieved “great pressure,” The New York Times reported Friday.

	"I just fired the head of the F.B.I. He was crazy, a real nut job," Trump said, according to a report based on a summary of the meeting obtained by the Times. 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/11/opinion/trump-russia-fbi-investigation.html
	The Trump-Russia Nexus
	By THE EDITORIAL BOARD
	MAY 11, 2017

	The acting director of the F.B.I., Andrew McCabe, told Congress on Thursday that President Trump’s firing of James Comey has not derailed the agency’s investigation into possible collusion between Russia and the Trump campaign. Which is good news. Despite Mr. Trump’s assertion that the idea of collusion is “a total hoax,” and despite many unknowns, the links continue to pile up.


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/863007411132649473
	James Comey better hope that there are no "tapes" of our conversations before he starts leaking to the press!
	5:26 AM - 12 May 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/863014620516233216
	When James Clapper himself, and virtually everyone else with knowledge of the witch hunt, says there is no collusion, when does it end?
	5:54 AM - 12 May 2017 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/trump-revealed-highly-classified-information-to-russian-foreign-minister-and-ambassador/2017/05/15/530c172a-3960-11e7-9e48-c4f199710b69_story.html
	Trump revealed highly classified information to Russian foreign minister and ambassador
	By Greg Miller and Greg Jaffe May 15


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/864452996129853444
	I have been asking Director Comey & others, from the beginning of my administration, to find the LEAKERS in the intelligence community.....
	5:10 AM - 16 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873120139222306817
	Despite so many false statements and lies, total and complete vindication...and WOW, Comey is a leaker!
	3:10 AM - 9 Jun 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873879934040780801
	I believe the James Comey leaks will be far more prevalent than anyone ever thought possible. Totally illegal? Very 'cowardly!'
	5:29 AM - 11 Jun 2017 


Trump reveals that he still thinks Comey let Clinton off the hook. He expresses his concerns with the upcoming judiciary committee hearing, calling out former Obama official Susan Rice for refusing to testify on unmasking and voicing his suspicion that former acting AG Yates is a source of classified leaks. He seems to view the criticism of his handling of the Flynn controversy as hypocritical, unfair, or embarrassing. Trump downplays Yate's testimony, which reveals Yates believed Flynn was compromised and her warnings to the White House were urgent. Yates says that "if nothing was done" after the warnings it would be "concerning."

Clapper confirms that foreign allies passed the U.S. intelligence describing "suspicious contacts" between Trump advisors and Russian intelligence agents. Trump asserts that Clapper testified there is "no evidence" of collusion between Russia and Trump.

The day of Yate's and Clapper's hearing, Rosenstein learns that Comey is to be fired. The next day, Rosenstein publishes a memo recommending Comey be fired for reasons that tend to criticize Comey for being too hard on Clinton. Trump had criticized Comey for going too easy on Clinton 6 days earlier. Trump cites the memo as the reason he fired Comey, saying he believes Rosenstein wrote it because of Comey's "poor performance before Congress." When asked later if he asked Rosenstein for a recommendation to fire Comey, Trump doesn't answer but says he was going to fire Comey anyway.

In an apparent attempt to intimidate him, Trump warns Comey that he "better hope that there are no 'tapes' of our conversations before he starts leaking to the press." It is unclear if Trump is talking about leaks of their conversations or leaks in general. Trump continues to rant about leakers, accusing Comey of being a leaker and charging that he had long ago asked Comey to "find the LEAKERS in the intelligence community."

In Comey's termination letter, Trump stresses that Comey informed him "on three separate occasions" that he is not under investigation. The next day, Trump meets with Russian ambassadors Kislyak and Lavrov in the Oval Office. Apparently, Trump hoped to make deals for closer cooperation and warmer relations between the United States and Russia. Trump described the meeting as "very, very good."

Trump posits that Comey will leak more than anybody could possibly imagine, in such a way as to be potentially "totally illegal" but definitely "very cowardly."


Trump told Comey he wanted his "loyalty," expressed his hopes that Comey could "see his way to letting Flynn go," asked Comey to "lift the cloud" of the Russia investigation over his dealmaking, then fired him. For the question of "what was Trump's intent?" behind these actions, Comey and Trump give very different interpretations.



------

Why did Trump fire Comey?




------

On Trump asking about Flynn:

http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	BURR: Director, when the president requested that you, and I quote "Let Flynn go," General Flynn had an unreported contact with the Russians, which is an offense, and if press accounts are right, there might have been discrepancies between facts and his FBI testimony. In your estimation, was general Flynn at that time in serious legal jeopardy, and in addition to that, do you sense that the president was trying to obstruct justice or just seek for a way for Mike Flynn to save face, given that he had already been fired?

	COMEY: General Flynn at that point in time was in legal jeopardy. There was an open FBI criminal investigation of his statements in connection with the Russian contacts, and the contacts themselves, and so that was my assessment at the time. I don't think it's for me to say whether the conversation I had with the president was an effort to obstruct. I took it as a very disturbing thing, very concerning, but that's a conclusion I'm sure the special counsel will work towards to try and understand what the intention was there, and whether that's an offense. 


So Flynn in legal jeopardy, Trump at least should know, says "I hope you can let this go."


------

On asking about loyalty






-----


http://www.thompsontimeline.com/congressional-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey/
	CHAFFETZ: You did not look at testimony that Hillary Clinton gave in the United State Congress, both the House and the Senate.

	...Did you review and look at those transcripts as to the intent of your recommendation.

	COMEY: I’m sure my folks did. I did not.


	...DESJARLAIS: OK. Do you know if she asked her whether she stands by the fact she that said she just used one device and that was for her convenience?

	COMEY: I don’t know. I know they established, in talking to her, she used many devices during her four years. So I don’t know whether they asked her specifically about that statement. That’s easy to check, though.

	DESJARLAIS: OK. I guess my point is, you’re trying to get inside the head of Hillary Clinton in this investigation and know whether there was intent. And so we all know what she told the people. That has been well-documented.

	She said that she did not do those things, that she did not send or receive classified e-mails, that she used one server and one device for her convenience.

	And since then, I think even in your statement, you recognize that those were not correct. Is that fair?

	COMEY: I really don’t want to get in the business of trying to parse and judge her public statements. And so I think I’ve tried to avoid doing that sitting here.

	DESJARLAIS: Why do you feel that’s important?

	COMEY: Because what matters to me is what did she say to the FBI.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. DIANNE FEINSTEIN: Thanks very much, Mr. Chairman. Mr. Comey, I just want you to know that I have great respect for you. Senator Cornyn and I sit on the judiciary committee and we have the occasion to have you before us. You're a man of strength and I regret the situations we all find ourselves in. I just want to say that. Let me begin with one overarching question. Why do you believe you were fired?

	COMEY: I guess I don't know for sure. I believe — I think the president, at his word, that I was fired because of the Russia investigation. Something about the way I was conducting it, the president felt created pressure on him that he wanted to relieve. Again, I didn't know that at the time. I watched his interview. I read the press accounts of his conversations. I take him at his word there. Look, I could be wrong. Maybe he's saying something that's not true. I take him at his word, at least based on what I know now. 








http://www.thompsontimeline.com/congressional-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey/
	COMEY: ...ignorance of the law is no excuse, but here’s the distinction. You have to have general criminal intent. You don’t need to know what particular statute you’re violating, but you must be aware of the generally wrongful nature of your conduct…


http://www.thompsontimeline.com/congressional-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey/
	COMEY: In our system of law, there’s a thing called mens rea. It’s important to know what you did and when you did it. This Latin phrase “mens rea” means, “What were you thinking?”

	We don’t want to put people in jail unless we prove that they knew they were doing something they shouldn’t do.

	...At the time Congress passed that statute in 1917, there was a lot of concern in the House and Senate about whether that was going to violate the American tradition of requiring that before you go and lock somebody up, you proved they knew they were doing something wrong. So there was a lot of concern about it.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: Now, here's the question, you're big. You're strong. I know the oval office, and I know what happens to people when they walk in. There is a certain amount of intimidation. But why didn't you stop and say, Mr. President, this is wrong. I cannot discuss this with you.

	COMEY: It's a great question. Maybe if I were stronger, I would have. I was so stunned by the conversation that I just took in. The only thing I could think to say, because I was playing in my mind -- because I could remember every word he said -- I was playing in my mind, what should my response be? That's why I carefully chose the words. Look, I've seen the tweet about tapes. Lordy, I hope there are tapes. I remember saying, “I agree he is a good guy,” as a way of saying, I'm not agreeing with what you asked me to do. Again, maybe other people would be stronger in that circumstance. That's how Ed myself. I hope I'll never have another opportunity. Maybe if I did it again, I'd do it better. 

	...FEINSTEIN: You told the president, I would see what we could do. What did you mean?

	COMEY: It was kind of a cowardly way of trying to avoid telling him, we're not going to do that. That I would see what we could do. It was a way of kind of getting off the phone, frankly, and then I turned and handed it to the acting deputy attorney general. 

	...RUBIO: At the time, did you say something to the president about, that is not an appropriate request, or did you tell the white house counsel, it's not an appropriate request? Someone needs to tell the president he can't do these things.

	COMEY: I didn't, no.

	RUBIO: Why?

	COMEY: I don't know. I think -- as I said earlier, I think the circumstances were such that it was -- I was a bit stunned and didn't have the presence of mind. I don't know. I don't want to make you sound like I'm captain courageous. I don't know if I would have said to the president with the presence of mind, sir, that's wrong. In the moment, it didn't come to my mind. What came to my mind is be careful what you say. I said, I agree Flynn is a good guy. 




	...COLLINS: I'd like to now turn to the conversations with the president about Michael Flynn, which had been discussed at great length.

	First, let me make very clear that the president never should have cleared the room and he never should have asked you, as you reported, to let it go, to let the investigation go. But I remain puzzled by your response. Michael Flynn is a good guy. You could have said, Mr. President, this meeting is inappropriate. This response could compromise the investigation. You should not be making such a request. It's fundamental to the operation of our government, the FBI be insulated from this kind of political pressure. You talked a bit today about that you were stunned by the president making the request. But my question to you is later on, upon reflection, did you go to anyone at the department of justice and ask them to call the white house counsel's office and explain that the president had to have a far better understanding and appreciation of his role vis-à-vis the FBI?

	COMEY: In general, I did. I spoke to the attorney general and spoke to the new deputy attorney general, Mr. Rosenstein, when he took office and explained my serious concern about the way in which the president is interacting, especially with the FBI. As I said in my testimony, I told the attorney general, it can't happen that you get kicked out of the room and the president talks to me. Why didn't we raise the specific? It was of investigative interest to figure out, what just happened with the president's request? I wouldn't want to alert the white house it had happened until we figured out what we were going to do with it investigatively.

	COLLINS: Your testimony was that you went to attorney general sessions and said, don't ever leave me alone with him again. Are you saying that you also told him that he had made a request that you let it go with regard to part of the investigation of Michael Flynn?

	COMEY: No. I specifically did not. I did not. 


	...FEINSTEIN: You have the president of the United States asking you to stop an investigation that is an important investigation. What was the response of your colleagues?

	COMEY: I think they were as shocked and troubled by it as I was. Some said things that led me to believe that. I don't remember exactly. But the reaction was similar to mine. They're all experienced people who never experienced such a thing, so they were very concerned. Then the conversation turned to about, so what should we do with this information? That was a struggle for us. Because we are the leaders of the FBI, so it's been reported to us, and I heard it and now shared it with the leaders of the FBI, our conversation was, should we share this with any senior officials at the justice department? Our primary concern was, we can't infect the investigative team. We don't want the agents and analysts working on this to know the president of the united States has asked, and when it comes from the president, I took it as a direction, to get rid of this investigation because we're not going to follow that request. So we decided, we have to keep it away from our troops.

	Is there anyone else we ought to tell at the justice department? We considered whether to tell -- the attorney general said we believe rightly he was shortly going to recuse. There was no other senate confirmed leaders in the justice department at that point. The deputy attorney general was Mr. Boente, acting shortly in the seat. We decided the best move would be to hold it, keep it in a box, document it, as we'd already done, and this investigation is going to do on. Figure out what to do with it down the road. Is there a way to corroborate it? It was our word against the president's. No way to corroborate this. My view of this changed when the prospect of tapes was raised. That's how we thought about it then. 





------








http://fortune.com/2016/07/15/hillary-clinton-email-scandal-poll/
	Republicans are also more likely than Democrats to say Clinton's email use is a major problem, 85 percent to 22 percent. But 49 percent of Democrats say it's a minor problem, while just 29 percent don't think it's a problem at all.








------


...

probably: discredit/politicize USIC
ruin USIC capabilities
politicize/cast doubt on Russian methods


I guess it does make sense to:

politicize CIA/narrative of Russian intervention as much as possible so that Repulicans, who typically like CIA/hate Russia, are reversed

utterly destroy the narrative and USIC by reveailing Russia narrative to be fake (dossier, intel leak thing, maybe hacking, others?) and USIC top levels to be corrupt and scheming

Republicans continue to hate CIA distrust Russia narratives

liberals confused, defeated, maybe feel betrayed by USIC 

key is that Republicans tend to be more bullheaded, so this wouldn't work as well the other way around

would likely rely, in their view, on liberals soul searching and tears to finish off themselves

fuck I'm cold

this has gotten to my head lol

but best case scenario for them is both Republicans and Democrats end up distrusting USIC


Politicizing any idea, event, institution, person, thing, etc. makes it easier for propagandists to control public perception around said thing.


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/first-read/democrats-now-give-cia-higher-marks-republicans-do-s-really-n703206



------






http://www.nationalreview.com/article/448480/james-comey-testimony-obstruction-justice-not-proven


------


Trump asking Comey to stay:

Trump might know Comey is known to threaten to quit? And that this causes problems...

Trump also says his advisors told him good things about Comey iirc?

And Trump got a "favor" from Comey, at least in his view


------


Comey wants people to think Trump is dirty:



http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	WARNER: ...Now you've had extensive experience at the department of justice and at the FBI. You've worked under presidents of both parties. What was about that meeting that led you to determine that you needed to start putting down a written record?

	COMEY: A combination of things. I think the circumstances, the subject matter, and the person I was interacting with. Circumstances, first, I was alone with the president of the United States, or the president-elect, soon to be president. The subject matter I was talking about matters that touch on the FBI's core responsibility, and that relate to the president, president-elect personally, and then the nature of the person. I was honestly concerned he might lie about the nature of our meeting so I thought it important to document. 




	WARNER: ...you should be prepared to assure then President-elect Trump that the FBI was not investigating him personally. Now, I understand that your leadership team, agreed with that but was that a unanimous decision? Was there any debate about that?

	COMEY: Wasn't unanimous. One of the members of the leadership team had a view you that although it was technically true we did not have a counter-intelligence file case open on then President-elect Trump. His concern was because we're looking at the potential, again, that's the subject of the investigation, coordination between the campaign and Russia, because it was President Trump, President-elect Trump's campaign, this person's view was inevitably his behavior, his conduct will fall within the scope of that work. And so he was reluctant to make the statement. I disagreed. I thought it was fair to say what was literally true. There was not a counterintelligence investigation of Mr. Trump, and I decided in the moment to say it, given the nature of our conversation.

	WARNER: At that moment in time, did you ever revisit that as in the subsequent sessions?

	COMEY: With the FBI leadership team? Sure. And the leader had that view that didn't change. His view was still that it was probably although literally true, his concern was it could be misleading, because the nature of the investigation was such that it might well touch, obviously it would touch, the campaign, and the person that headed the campaign would be the candidate, and so that was his view throughout. 



	WARNER: ...What was your impression, and what did you mean by this notion of a patronage relationship?

	COMEY: Well, my impression, and again it's my impression, I could always be wrong but my common sense told me what was going on is, either he had concluded or someone had told him that you didn't, you've already asked Comey to stay, and you didn't get anything for it.

	And that the dinner was an effort to build a relationship, in fact, he asked specifically, of loyalty in the context of asking me to stay. As I said, what was odd about that is we'd already talked twice about it by that point and he said I very much hope you'll stay. In fact, I just remembered sitting a third, when you've seen the. IC tour of me walking across the blue room, and what the president whispered in my ear was "I really look forward to working with you." So after those encounters -- 

	WARNER: That was a few days before your firing.

	COMEY: On the Sunday after the inauguration. The next Friday I have dinner and the president begins by wanting to talk about my job and so I'm sitting there thinking wait a minute three times we've already, you've already asked me to stay or talked about me staying. My common sense, again I could be wrong but my common sense told me what's going on here is, he's looking to get something in exchange for granting my request to stay in the job. 


-----


Comey interprets Trump saying he was fired because of the Russia investigation:

http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	SEN. DIANNE FEINSTEIN: Thanks very much, Mr. Chairman. Mr. Comey, I just want you to know that I have great respect for you. Senator Cornyn and I sit on the judiciary committee and we have the occasion to have you before us. You're a man of strength and I regret the situations we all find ourselves in. I just want to say that. Let me begin with one overarching question. Why do you believe you were fired?

	COMEY: I guess I don't know for sure. I believe — I think the president, at his word, that I was fired because of the Russia investigation. Something about the way I was conducting it, the president felt created pressure on him that he wanted to relieve. Again, I didn't know that at the time. I watched his interview. I read the press accounts of his conversations. I take him at his word there. Look, I could be wrong. Maybe he's saying something that's not true. I take him at his word, at least based on what I know now. 

	...FEINSTEIN: Do you believe the Russia investigation played a role?

	COMEY: In why I was fired?

	FEINSTEIN: Yes.

	COMEY: Yes. I've seen the president say so. 



	WYDEN: How would you characterize Attorney General Sessions's adherence to his recusal? In particular, with regard to his involvement in your firing, which the president has acknowledged was because of the Russian investigation.

	COMEY: That's a question I can't answer. I think it is a reasonable question. If, as the president said, I was fired because of the Russia investigation, why was the attorney general involved in that chain? I don't know. So I don't have an answer for the question. 



	HEINRICH: Fair enough. Told the reporter he never did that. You've testified that the president asked for your loyalty in that dinner. White house denies that. A lot of this comes down to who should we believe. Do you want to say anything as to why we should believe you?

	COMEY: My mother raised me not to say things like this about myself so I'm not going to. I think people should look at the whole body of my testimony. As I used to say to juries, when I talked about a witness, you can't cherry pick it. You can't say, I like these things he said but on this, he's a ten liar. You have to take it together. 


	HEINRICH: Fair enough. Told the reporter he never did that. You've testified that the president asked for your loyalty in that dinner. White house denies that. A lot of this comes down to who should we believe. Do you want to say anything as to why we should believe you?

	COMEY: My mother raised me not to say things like this about myself so I'm not going to. I think people should look at the whole body of my testimony. As I used to say to juries, when I talked about a witness, you can't cherry pick it. You can't say, I like these things he said but on this, he's a ten liar. You have to take it together. 

>:D


----

Comey interprets Trump's comments as asking him to fire Flynn:



http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: Let's go to the Flynn issue. The senator outlined, “I hope you could see your way to letting Flynn go. He is a good guy. I hope you can let this go.” But you also said in your written remarks, and I quote, that you “had understood the president to be requesting that we drop any investigation of Flynn in connection with false statements about his conversations with the Russian ambassador in December,”. Please go into that with more detail.

	COMEY: Well, the context and the president's word are what led me to that conclusion. As I said in my statement, I could be wrong, but Flynn had been forced to resign the day before. And the controversy around general Flynn at that point in time was centered on whether he lied to the vice president about his nature of conversations with the Russians, whether he had been candid with others in the course of that. So that happens on the day before. On the 1, the president makes reference to that. I understood what he wanted me to do was drop any investigation connected to Flynn's account of his conversations with the Russians. 


	RUBIO: And in that meeting, as you understood it, he was asking not about the general Russia investigation, he was asking specifically about the jeopardy that Flynn was in himself?

	COMEY: That's how I understood it. Yes, sir. 

	RUBIO: As you perceived it, while he hoped you did away with it, you perceived it as an order, given the setting, the position and some of the circumstances?

	COMEY: Yes. 



	RUBIO: The president's wishes were known to them, certainly by the next day when he had a press conference with the prime minister. Going back, the three requests were, number one, be loyal. Number two, let the Mike Flynn thing go. He is a good guy, been treated unfairly. Number three, can you please tell the American people what these leaders in congress already know, which you already know and what you told me three times, that I'm not under personally under investigation.

	COMEY: That's right. 



	WYDEN: Your testimony was that the president's request about Flynn could infect investigation. Had the president got what he wanted and what he asked of you, what would have been the effect on the investigation?

	COMEY: We would have closed any investigation of general Flynn in connection with his statements and encounters -- statements about encounters with Russians in the late part of December. We would have dropped an open criminal investigation. 




------

Comey excuses for not correcting Trump:


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: Now, here's the question, you're big. You're strong. I know the oval office, and I know what happens to people when they walk in. There is a certain amount of intimidation. But why didn't you stop and say, Mr. President, this is wrong. I cannot discuss this with you.

	COMEY: It's a great question. Maybe if I were stronger, I would have. I was so stunned by the conversation that I just took in. The only thing I could think to say, because I was playing in my mind -- because I could remember every word he said -- I was playing in my mind, what should my response be? That's why I carefully chose the words. Look, I've seen the tweet about tapes. Lordy, I hope there are tapes. I remember saying, “I agree he is a good guy,” as a way of saying, I'm not agreeing with what you asked me to do. Again, maybe other people would be stronger in that circumstance. That's how Ed myself. I hope I'll never have another opportunity. Maybe if I did it again, I'd do it better. 




	FEINSTEIN: You told the president, I would see what we could do. What did you mean?

	COMEY: It was kind of a cowardly way of trying to avoid telling him, we're not going to do that. That I would see what we could do. It was a way of kind of getting off the phone, frankly, and then I turned and handed it to the acting deputy attorney general. 


Or Comey could tell him that's innapropriate...


	RUBIO: At the time, did you say something to the president about, that is not an appropriate request, or did you tell the white house counsel, it's not an appropriate request? Someone needs to tell the president he can't do these things.

	COMEY: I didn't, no.

	RUBIO: Why?

	COMEY: I don't know. I think -- as I said earlier, I think the circumstances were such that it was -- I was a bit stunned and didn't have the presence of mind. I don't know. I don't want to make you sound like I'm captain courageous. I don't know if I would have said to the president with the presence of mind, sir, that's wrong. In the moment, it didn't come to my mind. What came to my mind is be careful what you say. I said, I agree Flynn is a good guy. 



	COLLINS: I'd like to now turn to the conversations with the president about Michael Flynn, which had been discussed at great length.

	First, let me make very clear that the president never should have cleared the room and he never should have asked you, as you reported, to let it go, to let the investigation go. But I remain puzzled by your response. Michael Flynn is a good guy. You could have said, Mr. President, this meeting is inappropriate. This response could compromise the investigation. You should not be making such a request. It's fundamental to the operation of our government, the FBI be insulated from this kind of political pressure. You talked a bit today about that you were stunned by the president making the request. But my question to you is later on, upon reflection, did you go to anyone at the department of justice and ask them to call the white house counsel's office and explain that the president had to have a far better understanding and appreciation of his role vis-à-vis the FBI?

	COMEY: In general, I did. I spoke to the attorney general and spoke to the new deputy attorney general, Mr. Rosenstein, when he took office and explained my serious concern about the way in which the president is interacting, especially with the FBI. As I said in my testimony, I told the attorney general, it can't happen that you get kicked out of the room and the president talks to me. Why didn't we raise the specific? It was of investigative interest to figure out, what just happened with the president's request? I wouldn't want to alert the white house it had happened until we figured out what we were going to do with it investigatively.

	COLLINS: Your testimony was that you went to attorney general sessions and said, don't ever leave me alone with him again. Are you saying that you also told him that he had made a request that you let it go with regard to part of the investigation of Michael Flynn?

	COMEY: No. I specifically did not. I did not. 


------

what is cloud



FEINSTEIN: You describe two phone calls that you received from president trump. One on March 30th and one on April 11. He, quote, described the Russia investigation as a cloud that was impairing his ability, end quote, as president, and asked you, quote, to lift the cloud, end quote. How did you interpret that? What did you believe he wanted you to do?

COMEY: I interpreted that as he was frustrated that the Russia investigation was taking up so much time and energy. I think he meant of the executive branch, but in the public square in general. It was making it difficult for him to focus on other priorities of his. But what he asked me was actually narrowing than that. I think what he meant by the cloud — and, again, I could be wrong — but the entire investigation is taking up oxygen and making it hard for me to focus on what I want to focus on. The ask was to get it out that I, the president, am not personally under investigation.

FEINSTEIN: After April 11th, did he ask you more ever about the Russia investigation? Did he ask you any questions?

COMEY: We never spoke again after April 11th.

FEINSTEIN: You told the president, I would see what we could do. What did you mean?

COMEY: It was kind of a cowardly way of trying to avoid telling him, we're not going to do that. That I would see what we could do. It was a way of kind of getting off the phone, frankly, and then I turned and handed it to the acting deputy attorney general.

FEINSTEIN: So I want to go into that. Who did you talk with about that, lifting the cloud, stop the investigation back at the FBI, and what was their response?

COMEY: The FBI, during one of the two conversations — I'm not remembering exactly — I think the first, my chief of staff was sitting in front of me and heard my end of the conversation because the president's call was a surprise. I discussed the lifting the cloud and the request with the senior leadership team who, typically, and I think in all the circumstances, was the deputy director, my chief of staff, the general counsel, the deputy director's chief counsel and, I think in a number of circumstances, the number three in the FBI and a few of the conversations included the head of the national security branch. The group of us that lead the FBI when it comes to national security.

FEINSTEIN: You have the president of the United States asking you to stop an investigation that is an important investigation. What was the response of your colleagues?

COMEY: I think they were as shocked and troubled by it as I was. Some said things that led me to believe that. I don't remember exactly. But the reaction was similar to mine. They're all experienced people who never experienced such a thing, so they were very concerned. Then the conversation turned to about, so what should we do with this information? That was a struggle for us. Because we are the leaders of the FBI, so it's been reported to us, and I heard it and now shared it with the leaders of the FBI, our conversation was, should we share this with any senior officials at the justice department? Our primary concern was, we can't infect the investigative team. We don't want the agents and analysts working on this to know the president of the united States has asked, and when it comes from the president, I took it as a direction, to get rid of this investigation because we're not going to follow that request. So we decided, we have to keep it away from our troops.

Is there anyone else we ought to tell at the justice department? We considered whether to tell -- the attorney general said we believe rightly he was shortly going to recuse. There was no other senate confirmed leaders in the justice department at that point. The deputy attorney general was Mr. Boente, acting shortly in the seat. We decided the best move would be to hold it, keep it in a box, document it, as we'd already done, and this investigation is going to do on. Figure out what to do with it down the road. Is there a way to corroborate it? It was our word against the president's. No way to corroborate this. My view of this changed when the prospect of tapes was raised. That's how we thought about it then.

FEINSTEIN: Thank you, Mr. Chairman.


So did Comey interpret the request as asking to get out that he was not under investigation? or "chill" the invetigation? or to "get it out there" and clear the air?



http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	FEINSTEIN: You describe two phone calls that you received from president trump. One on March 30th and one on April 11. He, quote, described the Russia investigation as a cloud that was impairing his ability, end quote, as president, and asked you, quote, to lift the cloud, end quote. How did you interpret that? What did you believe he wanted you to do?

	COMEY: I interpreted that as he was frustrated that the Russia investigation was taking up so much time and energy. I think he meant of the executive branch, but in the public square in general. It was making it difficult for him to focus on other priorities of his. But what he asked me was actually narrowing than that. I think what he meant by the cloud — and, again, I could be wrong — but the entire investigation is taking up oxygen and making it hard for me to focus on what I want to focus on. The ask was to get it out that I, the president, am not personally under investigation. 



	RUBIO: Are those the only two instances in which that back and forth happened, where the president was basically saying, and I'm paraphrasing here, it's okay. Do the Russia investigation. I hope it all comes out. I have nothing to do with anything Russia. It'd be great if it all came out, people around me were doing things that were wrong?

	COMEY: Yes. As I recorded it accurately there. That was the sentiment he was expressing. Yes, sir. 





------


fucking over the president


http://www.npr.org/2017/06/07/531643428/comey-opening-statement-for-senate-intelligence-hearing-annotated
	The IC leadership thought it important, for a variety of reasons, to alert the incoming President to the existence of this material, even though it was salacious and unverified. Among those reasons were: (1) we knew the media was about to publicly report the material and we believed the IC should not keep knowledge of the material and its imminent release from the President-Elect; and (2) to the extent there was some effort to compromise an incoming President, we could blunt any such effort with a defensive briefing.

	The Director of National Intelligence asked that I personally do this portion of the briefing because I was staying in my position and because the material implicated the FBI’s counter-intelligence responsibilities. We also agreed I would do it alone to minimize potential embarrassment to the President-Elect. Although we agreed it made sense for me to do the briefing, the FBI’s leadership and I were concerned that the briefing might create a situation where a new President came into office uncertain about whether the FBI was conducting a counter-intelligence investigation of his personal conduct. 




http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	COLLINS: Did you limit that statement to counterintelligence invest -- investigations, or were you talking about any FBI investigation?

	COMEY: I didn't use the term counterintelligence. I was briefing him about salacious and unverified material. It was in a context of that that he had a strong and defensive reaction about that not being true. My reading of it was it was important for me to assure him we were not person investigating him. So the context then was actually narrower, focused on what I just talked to him about. It was very important because it was, first, true, and second, I was worried very much about being in kind of a Jay Hoover type situation. I didn't want him thinking I was briefing him on this to sort of hang it over him in some way. I was briefing him on it because, because we had been told by the media it was about to launch. We didn't want to be keeping that from him. He needed to know this was being said. I was very keen not to leave him with an impression that the bureau was trying to do something to him. So that's the context in which I said, sir, we're not personally investigating you. 





	RUBIO: What he was asking you to do, would you have done here today?

	COMEY: Correct. Yes, sir. 



	COLLINS: Then on the January 27th dinner, you told the president that he should be careful about asking you to investigate because, “you might create a narrative that we are investigating him personally, which we weren't.” Again, were you limiting that statement to counterintelligence investigations, or more broadly, such as a criminal investigation?

	COMEY: I didn't modify the word investigation. It was, again, he was reacting strongly against the unverified material, saying I'm tempted to order you to investigate it. In the context of that, I said, sir, be careful about it. I might create a narrative we're investigating you personally. 



So Comey created perception that Trump was under investigation, says he would clear him, says "careful if we do anything about it we will create a narrative we're investigating you," then never bothers to actually do it, or really just shoot down the stupid dossier which is what he should have done all along anyway




So Comey is saying he needed to brief Trump on this because it was about to leak and he should know, and that he might be compromised.

But why conclude that? the dossier is sketchy

------

Comey docs mayb inadmissible:


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	BLUNT: So you didn't consider your memo or your sense of that conversation to be a government document. You considered it to be, somehow, your own personal document that you could share to the media as you wanted through a friend?

	COMEY: Correct. I understood this to be my recollection recorded of my conversation with the president. As a private citizen, I thought it important to get it out.

	BLUNT: Were all your memos that you recorded on classified or other ds memos that might be yours as a private citizen?

	COMEY: I'm not following the question.

	BLUNT: You said you used classified --

	COMEY: Not the classified documents. Unclassified. I don't have any of them anymore. I gave them to the special counsel. My view was that the content of those unclassified, memorialization of those conversations was my recollection recorded. 


	KING: With regard to your memos, isn't it true that in a court case when you're weighing evidence, contemporaneous memos and contemporaneous statements to third parties are considered probative in terms of the validity of testimony?

	COMEY: Yes.

	KING: Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 





------


http://www.npr.org/2017/06/07/531643428/comey-opening-statement-for-senate-intelligence-hearing-annotated
	The IC leadership thought it important, for a variety of reasons, to alert the incoming President to the existence of this material, even though it was salacious and unverified. Among those reasons were: (1) we knew the media was about to publicly report the material and we believed the IC should not keep knowledge of the material and its imminent release from the President-Elect; and (2) to the extent there was some effort to compromise an incoming President, we could blunt any such effort with a defensive briefing.

	The Director of National Intelligence asked that I personally do this portion of the briefing because I was staying in my position and because the material implicated the FBI’s counter-intelligence responsibilities. We also agreed I would do it alone to minimize potential embarrassment to the President-Elect. Although we agreed it made sense for me to do the briefing, the FBI’s leadership and I were concerned that the briefing might create a situation where a new President came into office uncertain about whether the FBI was conducting a counter-intelligence investigation of his personal conduct. 


http://time.com/4810345/james-comey-testimony-real-time-transcript/
	James Comey: ...I was speaking to him and briefing him about some salacious and unverified material. It was in a context of that that he had a strong and defensive reaction about that not being true, and my reading of it was, It was important for me to assure him we were not personally investigating him, and so the context then was actually narrower, focused on what I just talked to him about but very important because it was first true and second I was very, very much about being in kind of a -- kind of a J. Edgar Hoover type situation. I didn't want him thinking I was briefing him on this, to sort of hang it over him in some way, I was briefing him on it because we had been told by the media it was about to launch, we don't want to be keeping that from him, and if there was -- he needed to know this was being said. But I was very keen not to leave him with an impression that the bureau was trying to do something to him, and so that's the context in which I said, sir, we're not personally investigating you.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/05/03/read-the-full-testimony-of-fbi-director-james-comey-in-which-he-discusses-clinton-email-investigation/
	GRAHAM: Do you agree with me that a fusion was involved in preparing the dossier against Donald Trump? That would be interfering in our election by the Russians?

	COMEY: I don't want to say.




https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/03/20/full-transcript-fbi-director-james-comey-testifies-on-russian-interference-in-2016-election/
	KING: ...I think it was on January 6, when yourself, Admiral Rogers, Director Brennan, and General Clapper went to Trump tower to meet with President Trump. The media reports are that at the end of that meeting, Director Comey, you presented president-elect Trump with a copy of the now infamous or famous dossier. And I don't know how many people were in the room, but within hours, that was leaked to the media and that gave the media the excuse or the rationale to publish almost the entire dossier.

	Do you -- does that violate any law? I mean you were at a classified briefing with the president-elect of the United States and it had to be a very, very small universe of people who knew that you handed them that dossier and it was leaked out within hours. Are you making any effort to find out who leaked it and do you believe that constitute a criminal violation?

	COMEY: I can't say, Mr. King except I can answer in general.




https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/who-is-source-d-the-man-said-to-be-behind-the-trump-russia-dossiers-most-salacious-claim/2017/03/29/379846a8-0f53-11e7-9d5a-a83e627dc120_story.html
	In addition to the salacious allegations that gained widespread attention, the dossier attributed other claims to Millian.

	Over the summer, as Trump prepared to accept the Republican presidential nomination, Millian traveled to Russia. He posted pictures on his Facebook page showing that he attended a ­Russian government-sponsored summit in St. Petersburg in June. One photograph shows him with Russia’s minister for energy. Another shows him chatting with Russian aluminum magnate Oleg Deripaska, who is close to Putin. A spokeswoman for Deripaska declined to comment. A spokesman for the Russian Embassy did not respond to questions about Millian.

	Later in the summer, Millian continued boasting of his Trump connections.

	He told ABC News that he had been the “official broker” for the Trump-branded condo building and described Trump’s affinity for working with Russians. He pointed to “hundreds of millions of dollars that [Trump] received from interactions with Russian businessmen.”

	Millian added that Trump “likes Russia because he likes beautiful Russian ladies — talking to them, of course. And he likes to be able to make lots of money with Russians.”

	Millian told ABC that he was “absolutely not” involved with Russian intelligence. But when asked whether he had heard rumors to that effect, Millian replied, “Yes, of course.”




https://www.nytimes.com/2017/06/08/us/politics/senate-hearing-transcript.html
	HARRIS: Has anything you’ve learned in the months since your February 14th meeting changed your understanding of the president’s request? I guess it would be what he has said in public documents or public interviews?

	COMEY: Correct.


